District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
22 act may be cited as the "Modification Nos. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 Contract No. DCAM-20-AE-
23 0019 with DLR Group of DC, P.C., Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of
24 2025".
25 Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
26 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
27 requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
28 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code§ 2-352.02), the Council approves Modification Nos.
29 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 to Contract No. DCAM-20-AE-0019 with DLR Group of DC, P.C., and
30 authorizes payment in the not-to-exceed amount of $2,775,355 for the goods and services received
31 and to be received under the modifications.
32 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.

33 The Council adopts the fiscal statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal impact
34 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
35 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
36 Sec. 4. Effective date.
37 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
38 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
39 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
40 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
41 D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES
Pursuant to Section 202(c-1) of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, as amended, D.C.
Official Code § 2-352.02(c-1), the following Contract summary is provided:
COUNCIL CONTRACT SUMMARY
(Tipping)
Proposed Contract for Architectural - Engineering Services for Metropolitan Police Department
Daly Swing Space
(A) Contract Number: DCAM-20-AE-0019
Proposed Contractor: DLR Group of DC, P.C.
Proposed Contractor’s Principals: Rachel Chung, Principal
Original Contract Amount: $1,575,000 (inclusive of a letter contract in the
amount of $950,000)
Approved by Council on July 10, 2021, as CA24-
0192
Increase to Contract Amount: $1,200,255 (via mods 1-8)
New Contract Amount: $2,775,355
Unit and Method of Compensation: Progressive payments.
Term of Contract: A letter contract was executed on January 21, 2021.
The Final Completion Date is July 20, 2025 and the
Administrative Term Date is October 30, 2026
Type of Contract: Firm Fixed Price
Source Selection Method: Request for Proposals
(B) For a contract containing option periods, the contract amount for the base period and for each
option period. If the contract amount for one or more of the option periods differs from the
amount for the base period, provide an explanation of the reason for the difference:
1

Not applicable.
(C) The goods or services to be provided, the methods of delivering goods or services, and any
significant program changes reflected in the proposed contract:
The Contractor shall provide architectural and engineering services to support the Metropolitan
Police Department’s (MPD) relocation to swing spaces during the renovation of the Daly Building.
The designated swing spaces are located at One Judiciary Square and 501 New York Avenue, NW,
Washington, DC 20003. The Contractor is responsible for furnishing all necessary professional
design services, materials, tools, supplies, and equipment to complete the project.
Modification No. 8 incorporates additional scope essential to the successful completion of the project,
prompted by changes resulting from Board of Zoning Appeals (BZA) hearings associated with the
project. The added services include:
a) Revisions to the construction documents (“CDs”);
b) Meetings with the Historic Preservation Review Board (“HPRB”);
c) Submissions to the District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) and the Department
of Buildings (“DOB”);
d) Design of fencing;
e) Modifications to building glazing and sound attenuation; and
f) Design of a Secure Compartmented Authorized Access Area.
On January 21, 2021, a Letter Contract was executed by DGS in the NTE amount of $950,000.
On July 10, 2021, the Contract was approved by the Council, as CA24-0192, in the amount of
$1,575,000 (inclusive of the initial $950,000 letter contract).
Modification Nos. 1 – 7 were executed as follows,:
Mod. 1: Increase in contract value by $595,000 issued on September 22, 2022
Mod. 2: Increase in contract value by $87,600, issued on April 21, 2023
Mod. 3: Increase in contract value by $29,000, issued on October 12, 2023
Mod. 4: Increase in contract value by $158,950, issued on March 29, 2024
Mod. 5: Increase in contract value by $0, this was a time extension with no cost issued on May
09, 2024
Mod. 6: Increase in contract value by $72,125, issued on August 14, 2024
Mod. 7: Increase in contract value by $26,000, issued on September 05, 2024.
The amount of Modification Nos. 1 - 7 ($968,675) was less than $1 million; thus, Council approval
was not required.
If approved, Modification No. 8 will increase the amount of the contract by $231,680, increasing the
total value of the Modifications to $1,200,355 ($968,675 + $231,680) and the total value of the
Contract to $2,775,355.
2

Modification No. 8 will therefore “tip” the cumulative value of the contract modifications over $1
million. The total sum of Modification Nos. 1-8 is $1,200,355 and requires Council approval.
(D) The selection process, including the number of offerors, the evaluation criteria, and the
evaluation results, including price, technical or quality, and past performance components:
a. On August 26, 2020, the Department issued a Request for Proposals (“RFP”) DCAM-20-
AE-0019 to engage a design firm to serve as the Architect/Engineer (“AE”) for the MPD
Daly Building and OJS Swing Space (“Project”).
b. On October 2, 2020, the Bid Due Date, the Department received six (6) proposals from
six (6) Offerors.
c. The Department determined that the best technical and overall proposal from DLR Group
was the most advantageous to the District.
d. No responses were received from the public to challenge the decision, and a Letter
Contract was executed on January 21, 2021, with a not-to-exceed amount of $950,000.
e. On July 10, 2021, the Contract (DCAM-20-AE-0019) was approved by the Council,
CA24-0192, in the amount of $1,575,000 (inclusive of the initial NTE amount of
$950,000 in the Letter Contract).
f. Since then, seven (7) modifications have been executed collectively in the total amount of
$968,675 while the current request (Modification No. 8) is in the amount of $231,680.
The Department now seeks Council’s approval to execute the Modification to the
Contract in the amount of $1,200,355.
(E) A description of any bid protest related to the award of the contract, including whether the
protest was resolved through litigation, withdrawal of the protest by the protestor, or voluntary
corrective action by the District. Include the identity of the protestor, the grounds alleged in
the protest, and any deficiencies identified by the District as a result of the protest:
The Contract award was not protested.
(F) The background and qualifications of the proposed contractor, including its organization,
financial stability, personnel, and performance on past or current government or private sector
contracts with requirements similar to those of the proposed contract:
The Contractor is a certified Small Business Enterprise (“SBE”), Washington, DC-based firm,
founded in 1996. The Contractor provides complete professional architectural services and is
dedicated to pursuing design excellence across a range of project types and scales. The Contractor
possesses the financial stability to successfully perform the Project and has provided a staffing plan
for the Project, which has been reviewed and approved by the Department. The Contractor has been
determined responsible in accordance with 27 DCMR § 4706.1.
(G) The period of performance associated with the proposed change, including date as of which the
proposed change is to be made effective:
From January 21, 2021, through October 30, 2026 (Administrative Term Date)
3

(H) The value of any work or services performed pursuant to a proposed change for which the
Council has not provided approval, disaggregated by each proposed change if more than one
proposed change has been aggregated for Council review:
On January 21, 2021, a Letter Contract was executed by DGS in the NTE amount of $950,000.
On July 10, 2021, the Contract was approved by the Council, as CA24-0192, in the amount of
$1,575,000 (inclusive of the initial $950,000 letter contract).
Seven (7) modifications have been executed with the vendor. The amount of Modification Nos. 1 - 7
($968,675) was less than $1 million; thus, Council approval was not required.
If approved, Modification No. 8 will increase the amount of the contract by $231,680, increasing the
total value of the Modifications to $1,200,355 ($968,675 + $231,680) and the total value of the
Contract to $2,775,355. Modification No. 8 will therefore “tip” the cumulative value of the contract
modifications over $1 million. The total sum of Modification Nos. 1-8 is $1,200,355 and requires
Council approval.
(I) The aggregate dollar value of the proposed changes as compared with the amount of the
contract as awarded:
If approved, Modification No. 8 will increase the amount of the contract by $231,680, increasing the
total value of the Modifications to $1,200,355 ($968,675 + $231,680) and the total value of the
Contract to $2,775,355. Modification No. 8 will therefore “tip” the cumulative value of the contract
modifications over $1 million. The total sum of Modification Nos. 1-8 is $1,200,355 and requires
Council approval.
(J) The date on which the contracting officer was notified of the proposed change:
April 08, 2025
(K) The reason why the proposed change was sent to Council for approval after it is intended to
take effect:
Seven (7) modifications have been executed with the vendor. The amount of Modification Nos. 1 - 7
($968,675) was less than $1 million; thus, Council approval was not required.
If approved, Modification No. 8 will increase the amount of the contract by $231,680, increasing the
total value of the Modifications to $1,200,355 ($968,675 + $231,680) and the total value of the
Contract to $2,775,355. Modification No. 8 will therefore “tip” the cumulative value of the contract
modifications over $1 million. The total sum of Modification Nos. 1-8 is $1,200,355 and requires
Council approval.
(L) The reason for the proposed change:
4

Proposed Modification No. 8 in the amount of $231,680 will allow the Contractor to continue to
provide architectural and engineering services for the Metropolitan Police Department Daly Building
Swing Space. DGS finds these added costs fair and reasonable and therefore recommends approval.
(M) The legal, regulatory, or contractual authority for the proposed change:
Congress amended § 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act by requiring that no contract
involving the expenditure of funds in excess of $1 million in a 12-month period be made “unless the
Mayor submits the contract to the Council for its approval and the Council approves the contract.”
District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995 § 304(a), 109
Stat. 151 Pub. L. 104-8 (April 17, 1995) (codified at D.C. Official Code §1-204.51(b) (2001).
If approved, Modification No. 8 will increase the amount of the contract by $231,680, increasing the
total value of the Modifications to $1,200,355 ($968,675 + $231,680) and the total value of the
Contract to $2,775,355. Modification No. 8 will therefore “tip” the cumulative value of the contract
modifications over $1 million. The total sum of Modification Nos. 1-8 is $1,200,355 and requires
Council approval.
(N) A summary of the subcontracting plan required under section 2346 of the Small, Local, and
Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of 2005, as amended, D.C.
Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq. (“Act”), including a certification that the subcontracting plan
meets the minimum requirements of the Act and the dollar volume of the portion of the contract
to be subcontracted, expressed both in total dollars and as a percentage of the total contract
amount:
The Contractor’s subcontracting plan meets the minimum requirements of the Act as follows:
Contract Dollar Value: $2,775,355
Self-Performing Requirement %: 35%
Contractor Self-Performing Amount: $2,775,355
Total Available for Subcontracting: $333,042.60
SBE Subcontracting Requirement %: 35% of the total available for subcontracting
SBE Subcontracting Plan Required Dollar Value: $116,564.91
SBE Subcontracting Plan Actual Dollar Value: $117,000
(O) Performance standards and the expected outcome of the proposed contract:
The Contractor shall provide architectural and engineering services for MPD to build out tenant
spaces, which will serve as swing space while the Daly Building is being renovated. The swing space
will be located at One Judiciary Square, Washington, DC 20003, and 501 New York Avenue, NW,
Washington, DC 20003. Modification No. 8 is being made to incorporate additional scope, which is
deemed essential to the successful completion of the project. The Contractor was requested to provide
services in relation to the BZA hearings, which changed the project. The additional scope includes
(a) Modifying the CDs, (b) Meeting with the Historic Preservation Review Board, (c) submissions to
DDOT and DOB, (d) design of fencing, (e) modifications to building glazing and sound attenuation,
and (f) design of a secure compartmented authorized access area.
5

(P) The amount and date of any expenditure of funds by the District pursuant to the contract prior
to its submission to the Council for approval:
Seven (7) modifications have been executed with the vendor. The amount of Modification Nos. 1 - 7
($968,675) was less than $1 million; thus, Council approval was not required.
If approved, Modification No. 8 will increase the amount of the contract by $231,680, increasing the
total value of the Modifications to $1,200,355 ($968,675 + $231,680) and the total value of the
Contract to $2,775,355. Modification No. 8 will therefore “tip” the cumulative value of the contract
modifications over $1 million. The total sum of Modification Nos. 1-8 is $1,200,355 and requires
Council approval.
(Q) A certification that the proposed contract is within the appropriated budget authority for the
agency for the fiscal year and is consistent with the financial plan and budget adopted in
accordance with D.C. Official Code §§ 47-392.01 and 47-392.02:
The Office of the Chief Financial Officer has certified that the Department of General Services (DGS
– Implementing AGY) has $1,200,355 in the Metropolitan Police Department (MPD – Owner
Agency) cumulative budget authority balance. The applicable Fiscal Sufficiency certification
accompanies this Council Package.
(R) A certification that the contract is legally sufficient, including whether the proposed contractor
has any pending legal claims against the District:
Modification Nos. 1 – 7, and the proposed Modification No. 8 have been deemed legally sufficient
by the District’s Office of the Attorney General. The Contractor does not appear to have any currently
pending legal claims against the District.
(S) A certification that Citywide Clean Hands database indicates that the proposed contractor is
current with its District taxes. If the Citywide Clean Hands Database indicates that the
proposed contractor is not current with its District taxes, either: (1) a certification that the
contractor has worked out and is current with a payment schedule approved by the District; or
(2) a certification that the contractor will be current with its District taxes after the District
recovers any outstanding debt as provided under D.C. Official Code § 2-353.01(b):
The Citywide Clean Hands database indicates that the Contractor is current with its District taxes.
The relevant Clean Hands Certificate accompanies this Council Package.
(T) A certification from the proposed contractor that it is current with its federal taxes, or has
worked out and is current with a payment schedule approved by the federal government:
The Contractor has certified that it is in compliance with federal tax laws.
6

(U) The status of the proposed contractor as a certified local, small, or disadvantaged business
enterprise as defined in the Small, Local, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development
and Assistance Act of 2005, as amended, D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.:
The Contractor is certified by the DC Department of Small and Local Business Development
(“DSLBD”), as stated on the DSLBD website. The Contractor’s Certification Number is
LZR31909032028, with an expiration date of March 20, 2028.
(V) Other aspects of the proposed contract that the Chief Procurement Officer considers
significant:
None.
(W) A statement indicating whether the proposed contractor is currently debarred from providing
services or goods to the District or federal government, the dates of the debarment, and the
reasons for debarment:
The Contractor is not debarred from providing services to the Government of the District of Columbia
or the Federal Government according to the Office of Contracts and Procurement’s Excluded Parties
List and the Federal Government’s Excluded Parties List.
(X) Any determination and findings issues relating to the contract’s formation, including any
determination and findings made under D.C. Official Code § 2-352.05 (privatization contracts):
Not applicable.
(Y) Where the contract, and any amendments or modifications, if executed, will be made available
online:
Contract award information, Contract and Modification Nos. 1 – 7, are available on the Department’s
website. A copy of the proposed Modification No. 8 (if approved) will be made available.
(Z) Where the original solicitation, and any amendments or modifications, will be made available
online:
The Solicitation for the Request for Proposals (“RFP”) was posted on the Department’s website:
https://dgs.dc.gov/publication/dcam-20-ae-0019-architecturalengineering-services-mpd-daly-and-
oag-swing-ojs-building
(AA) (1) A certification that the proposed contractor has been determined not to be in violation of
section 334a of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and
Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.34a; and
(2) A certification from the proposed contractor that it currently is not and will not be in
7

violation of section 334a of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment
and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.34a:
Based upon a certification from the Contractor, the Contractor has been determined not to be in
violation of D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.34a; and will not be in violation of D.C. Official Code § 1-
1163.34a.
(BB) A description of any other contracts the proposed contractor is currently seeking or holds with
the District:
Client Solicitation Project Name Description Value
Agency /Contract Number
Department
DC DGS Therapeutic
of General
Services DCAM-19-AE-0064 Recreation Center $2,532,750
Department
DCAM-25-NC-CA- DG Energy Management
of General
Services 0001 Plan FY25 $229,700
Department
Anacostia Recreation
of General
Services DCAM-20-AE-0005 Center at Ketcham $1,837,503.51
Department
DCAM-22-AE-RFP- DC DGS AE Svcs for the
of General
Services 0002 Jelleff Comm Ctr $2,172,979
Department
DCAM-23-CS-RFP- DC DGS - Brent Elementary
of General
Services 0016 School $4,100,000
8

(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:3)
9(cid:17):(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:15);(cid:9)(cid:15)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:5)(cid:8)(cid:14)=(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:17)>?;@(cid:14)(cid:12)
A<<(cid:14)=(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:6)(cid:14)(cid:9)<(cid:3).(cid:14)(cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:15)=(cid:14)(cid:12)>(cid:3)A<<(cid:14)=(cid:9)(cid:8) (cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:0)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:5)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:11)
A<<(cid:14)=(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)B(cid:12)C(cid:3)(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:3)E(cid:9):(cid:9)(cid:15)?(cid:9)(cid:3) (cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:14)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:2)(cid:2)(cid:20)(cid:4)
(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:24)(cid:3)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:25)(cid:23)(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:24)(cid:30) (cid:31)(cid:22) (cid:3)!"#(cid:3)"$"% (cid:27)(cid:25)(cid:23)(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:24)(cid:3)(cid:27)*+,(cid:24)-(cid:30)&$$!’!()’$"
(cid:18)FE(cid:3)9EAGH(cid:3)A.(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:3)H(cid:19) ./012(cid:3)3343335(cid:4)(cid:2)(cid:0)
(cid:4)(cid:0)I(cid:3)8BJ(cid:3)(cid:7)B(cid:3)1(cid:11)(cid:3).F(cid:3)(cid:20) (cid:19)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:9)(cid:3)0(cid:18)2(cid:3)(cid:0)67(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:20)8
(cid:11)K(cid:7)J019BA1(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:2)(cid:2)(cid:2)(cid:4)4(cid:20)(cid:20)55
(cid:3)
(cid:3)
‘abcded‘fca(cid:3)ge(cid:3)‘hafi(cid:3)jfikl
K(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:8)(cid:9)X(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:5)(cid:9)D(cid:3)(cid:14)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:19)>(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:3)J(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:13)Z(cid:13)(cid:5)(cid:9);(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:12)@(cid:17):(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:8)(cid:9)<(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:15)=(cid:9)D(cid:3)(cid:14)(cid:15)D(cid:14):(cid:14)D?(cid:12)>m(cid:9)(cid:15)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:5)Z(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:17)?(cid:5)(cid:13)(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:14)(cid:15)(cid:16)
>(cid:14)(cid:12)@(cid:14)>(cid:14)(cid:5)Z(cid:3)n(cid:14)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:5)(cid:8)(cid:14)=(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:17)>?;@(cid:14)(cid:12)(cid:3)A<<(cid:14)=(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)B(cid:12)C(cid:3)(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:3)E(cid:9):(cid:9)(cid:15)?(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:9)X(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:5);(cid:9)(cid:15)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)/;X>(cid:17)Z;(cid:9)(cid:15)(cid:5)
(cid:7)(cid:9)(cid:8):(cid:14)=(cid:9)(cid:13)[(cid:3)K(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)D(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:12)@(cid:17):(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:14)(cid:15)D(cid:14):(cid:14)D?(cid:12)>m(cid:9)(cid:15)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:5)Z(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:3)=(cid:17);X>(cid:14)(cid:9)D(cid:3)n(cid:14)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:17)D(cid:9)(cid:3)o(cid:3)(cid:4)84(cid:20)67(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:9)<(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:9)
(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:5)(cid:14)<(cid:14)=(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:19)>(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:3)J(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:13)?(cid:9)D[
B0BF/(cid:3)(cid:4)8[(cid:3)BKpKB0A1(cid:10)(cid:3)F0(cid:19)/1(cid:7)019(cid:10)(cid:3)H/EY0B(cid:7)(cid:10)(cid:3)K(cid:7)(cid:7)/(cid:7)(cid:7)Y/1B(cid:7)(cid:10)(cid:3)K1(cid:18)(cid:3).//(cid:7)
(cid:19)JKHB/E(cid:3)(cid:20)6(cid:3)9/1/EKF(cid:3)F0(cid:19)/1(cid:7)/
(cid:7)Gq(cid:19)JKHB/E(cid:3)00[(cid:3)(cid:19)F/K1(cid:3)JK1(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:3)q/.AE/(cid:3)E/(cid:19)/0^019(cid:3)K(cid:3)F0(cid:19)/1(cid:7)/(cid:3)AE(cid:3)H/EY0B
(cid:18)[(cid:19)[(cid:3)(cid:19)A(cid:18)/(cid:3)o(cid:3)(cid:4)84(cid:20)67(cid:20)(cid:3)r(cid:20)(cid:2)(cid:2)7s
o(cid:3)(cid:4)84(cid:20)67(cid:20)(cid:3)HEAJ0q0B0A1(cid:3)K9K01(cid:7)B(cid:3)0(cid:7)(cid:7)GK1(cid:19)/(cid:3)A.(cid:3)F0(cid:19)/1(cid:7)/(cid:3)AE(cid:3)H/EY0B
S*(cid:23)N(cid:25)-(cid:28)U(cid:24)Q(cid:3)L (cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:24)P(cid:28)MQ(cid:22)(cid:3)V(cid:24)MW(cid:28)MT
L-(cid:22)M(cid:29)N(cid:3)ON(cid:28)(cid:24)(cid:26)#(cid:3)O(cid:25)PP(cid:24)(cid:29)(cid:23)(cid:28)(cid:25)M(cid:3)(cid:22)MQ(cid:3)RM(cid:26)(cid:25)-(cid:29)(cid:24)+(cid:24)M(cid:23)(cid:3)SQ+(cid:28)M(cid:28)T(cid:23)-(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:28)(cid:25)M
B(cid:17)(cid:3):(cid:12)>(cid:14)D(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:3)=(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:5)(cid:14)<(cid:14)=(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:3)X>(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:9)(cid:3):(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:5)(cid:3)YZB(cid:12)C[(cid:18)(cid:19)[(cid:16)(cid:17):[(cid:3)A(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)YZB(cid:12)C(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:17);(cid:9)X(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:3)=>(cid:14)=\(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)
]^(cid:12)>(cid:14)D(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:5)(cid:14)<(cid:14)=(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:17)<(cid:3)(cid:19)>(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:3)J(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:13)_(cid:3)(cid:6)ZX(cid:9)(cid:8)>(cid:14)(cid:15)\(cid:3)?(cid:15)D(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:19)>(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:3)J(cid:12)(cid:15)D(cid:13)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:9)=(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:17)(cid:15)[
ttut(cid:3)vwx(cid:3)lwyzzw(cid:3)l{|(cid:3)l}~wz(cid:3){(cid:127)(cid:128)u|(cid:3){(cid:129)(cid:130)x~(cid:131)(cid:132)w(cid:133)(cid:131)|(cid:3)k‘(cid:3)(cid:127)uu(cid:127)v(cid:134)(cid:135)x(cid:133)(cid:131)z(cid:136)(cid:3)(cid:137)(cid:127)u(cid:127)(cid:138)(cid:3)(cid:128)(cid:127)v(cid:139)(cid:140)uv(cid:140)(cid:134)(cid:141)(cid:142)c(cid:129)(cid:143)(cid:144)k‘(cid:144)(cid:132)(cid:133)(cid:145)
(cid:3)

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES
Memorandum
To: Delano Hunter
Director, Department of General Services (“DGS”)
From: Antoinette Hudson Beckham
Agency Fiscal Officer
Reference: Contract No. DCAM-20-AE-0019
Architectural - Engineering Services for Metropolitan Police Department
(MPD) Daly Swing Space
Date: May 7, 2025
Subject: Fiscal Sufficiency Review
In my capacity as the Agency Fiscal Officer of the Department of General Services (the
“Department”), I hereby state that the Architectural - Engineering Services for MPD Daly Swing
Space (DCAM-20-AE-0019), with DLR Group of DC, P.C in the amount of $1,200,355.00, is
consistent with the Department’s current budget and that adequate funds are available in the budget
for the expenditure.
Per the Department’s Contracts & Procurement (C&P) team, on January 21, 2021, a Letter contract
was executed by the Department with an initial Not-to-Exceed amount of $950,000.00, while a
Definitized Contract was executed on August 9, 2021, with a Not-to-Exceed amount of
$1,575,000.00.
Several Modifications (1,2,3,4,6, and 7), to the contract, with a total value of $968,675.00, have been
executed. Modification No. 5 was a $0 change order.
Per C&P, the proposed Modification No. 8,, in the amount of $231,680.00, is to provide
Architectural-Engineering Services for MPD Daly Swing Space. The Proposed Modification is a
tipper ($231,680.00 + $968,675.00 = $1,200,355.00), requiring council approval. Contract values of
$1m or more, require Council approval. The proposed increase will also increase the total contract
value to $2,775,355.00 ($1,200,355.00 + $1,575,000.00).
The Department of General Services (DGS – Implementing AGY) has $1,200,355.00 in the
Metropolitan Police Department (MPD – Owner AGY) cumulative capital budget authority balance.

Contract No. DCAM-20-AE-0019
Architectural - Engineering Services for Metropolitan Police Department (MPD) Daly
Swing Space
DCAM-20-AE-0019: DALY BUILDING
REDEVELOPMENT
Summary of RKs and Purchase
Orders
VENDOR: DLR
GROUP
The PASS/DIFS information is attached/below.
Project Name Project Fund AY Imp. Owner RK/PO Amount Comments
Number Detail AGY AGY
DALY PO672048 Modification 1
BUILDING BRM18C 300 2017 AM0 AM0 $595,000.00
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Modification 2
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0 AM0 $87,600.00
BUILDING PO686535
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Modification 3
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0 AM0 $29,000.00
BUILDING PO697125
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Modification 4
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0 AM0 $158,950.00
BUILDING PO707840
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Modification 6
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0 AM0 PO712665 $72,125.00
BUILDING
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Modification 7
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0
BUILDING AM0 PO712484 $26,000.00
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Part of the
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0 AM0 RK302722 $152,000.00 proposed Mod. 8
BUILDING $231,680.00
SWING
AM0.BRM18C. Part of the
DALY/MPD 100023 3030300 N/A AM0 AM0 $79,680.00 proposed Mod. 8
BUILDING RK302465 $231,680.00
SWING
Total $1,200,355.00
_____________________________
Antoinette Hudson Beckham
Agency Fiscal Officer
Department of General Services

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: June 6, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the Modification Nos. 1 through 8 to Contract No.
DCAM-20-AE-0019 with DLR Group of DC, P.C. Approval and Payment
Authorization Emergency Act of 2025 and Accompanying Emergency Declaration
Resolution (AE-25-353)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov
3

Contracts & Procurement
January 20, 2021
By Electronic Mail
Ms. Rachel Chung
Principal-in-Charge
DLR Group of DC, P.C.
419 7th Street NW, Second Floor
Washington, DC 20004
rchung@dlrgroup.com
Reference: Request for Proposals No. DCAM-19 -AE- 0019 (“RFP”) - Architectural and
Engineering Services for MPD Daly and OJS Swing Space (“Project”)
Subject: Notice to Proceed and Letter Contract
Dear Ms. Chung
We refer to the offer submitted by DLR Group (the “Architect/Engineer” or “A/E”) in response to the above
referenced RFP. We are pleased to inform you that this Project has been awarded to DLR Group and if this
letter contract (“Letter Contract”) is signed by the A/E without modification of any kind, it will serve as a
notice to proceed for the work described below. This notice to proceed is subject to the following terms:
1. Letter Contract. This is a Letter Contract between the A/E, and the District of Columbia
Government, acting by and through its Department of General Services (“DGS” or the “Department”), and
shall govern our relationship until such time as a final contract is entered into for the work described in the
above referenced RFP (the “Definitized Contract”); provided, however, that to the extent an issue is not
covered in this Letter Contract, the RFP shall govern. Once the Definitized Contract is signed by the
Department, this Letter Contract shall automatically terminate and merge into the Definitized Contract.
2. Scope of Work. The A/E is authorized to provide all professional services, materials, tools,
supplies and equipment necessary to advance the design and obtain the necessary permits for the Project.
3. Deliverables. In connection with the services provided pursuant to this Letter Contract, the A/E
shall provide, at a minimum, the deliverables in accordance with the requirements in the RFP and Form of
Contract to the Department’s Program Manager and in the referenced instances
to the Contracting Officer.
In the event that the A/E fails to timely submit any such deliverable, the A/E shall pay to the Department
Government of the District of Columbia
Department of General Services | dgs.dc.gov
@dcdgs
2000 14th Street NW, 8th Floor, Washington, DC 20009

DCAM-20-AE-0019 NTP Letter of Contract
Architectural and Engineering Services | MPD Daly and OJS Swing Space
Page 2 of 3
as liquidated damages ($5000) dollars plus ($500) per day after receiving written notice from either the
COTR or the Contracting Officer of failure to submit each deliverable. This remedy is cumulative and does
not limit any other right or remedy of the Department under the contract or applicable District law.
4. Not to Exceed Amount. The limit of this authorization is $950,000.00. In no event shall the A/E
be entitled to receive more than this amount under this Letter Contract. This not-to-exceed amount includes
all costs incurred by the A/E in connection with the work authorized hereby. In no event shall the A/E be
entitled to receive more than the Not-To-Exceed Amount under this Letter Contract unless authorized in
advance and in writing by a duly authorized Contracting Officer.
5. Insurance. At all times while working under this Letter Contract, the A/E shall maintain insurance
as described in the RFP. All such policies shall be endorsed to add the District of Columbia, including, but
not limited to, its Department of General Services, and the respective agents, employees and offices of each
as additional insureds.
6. Duration. Once signed by the A/E, the Letter Contract will become effective on the date the Letter
Contract is executed by the Department. This Letter Contract will terminate on the earlier to occur of the
following: (i) the date the Definitized Contract becomes effective; or (ii July 30, 2021. DGS reserves the
right to terminate this Letter Contract, in whole or specified part, for convenience in the manner described
in the District of Columbia Department of General Services Standard Contract Provisions General
Provisions for Architectural and Engineering Services Contracts dated October 2018, attached as Exhibit
A.
7. Project Teams. The A/E shall utilize the Department’s Project Teams system to submit any and all
documentation required to be provided by the A/E for the Project, including, but not limited to: (i) requests
for information; (ii) submittals; (iii) meeting minutes; (iv) invoices/applications for payment (full package
including all forms required by DGS); (v) certified payrolls (in addition to upload via LCP Tracker); (vi)
drawings and specifications; (vii) punchlist; and (viii) other documents as may be designated by the
Department. The A/E also shall require all subcontractors and subconsultants to utilize prolog for the
Project.
8. Purchase Order Number. This Letter Contract will become effective on the date the Letter Contract
is executed by the Department. The Department’s Contracting & Procurement Division will issue a
purchase order number within five (5) business days. The purchase order will be sent in a separate cover.
That number should be included in all future invoices and accounting records. In the event that you do not
obtain a purchase order number please contact Tracy Birkett via cp.contract-spec7@dc.gov directly to
obtain this number.
9. Ownership and Use of Documents. All documents and work product prepared by the A/E shall
become the property of the Department upon the payment of invoices submitted under the Letter Contract.
Government of the District of Columbia
Department of General Services | dgs.dc.gov
@dcdgs
2000 14th Street NW, 8th Floor, Washington, DC 20009

DCAM-20-AE-0019 NTP Letter of Contract
Architectural and Engineering Services | MPD Daly and OJS Swing Space
Page 3 of 3
10. Entire Agreement; Modification. This Letter Contract, along with the Standard Contract Provisions
(Exhibit A – Architectural and Engineering Services) supersede all contemporaneous or prior
negotiations, representations, course of dealing, or agreements, either written or oral. No modifications to
this Letter Contract shall be effective against the Department and unless made in writing signed by the
Department. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 10, nothing herein shall limit the Department’s
ability to unilaterally modify this Letter Contract.
11. Order of Precedence. The following documents are incorporated into this NTP Letter of Contract
in the following order of precedence:
1. RFP No. DCAM-20-AE-0019 (by reference)
a) Exhibit A SOW
b) Exhibit A.1 Addendum 1
c) Exhibit A.2 Addendum 2
d) Exhibit A.3 Addendum 3
e) Exhibit A.4 RFI
3. The Contractor's proposal (Exhibit B)
4. Davis Bacon Act Wage Determination (Exhibit C)
5. The District of Columbia Department of General Services Standard Contract Provisions for A&E
(Exhibit D)
6. Service Contract Act (Exhibit E)
7. Small Business Plan (Exhibit F)
8. First Source Agreement (Exhibit G).
ISSUED BY: ACCEPTED BY:
By: By:
Name: Franklin Austin Name:
Title: Contracting Officer Title:
Date: _______________________ Date:
Government of the District of Columbia
Department of General Services | dgs.dc.gov
@dcdgs
2000 14th Street NW, 8th Floor, Washington, DC 20009

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES
No. 7
Modification Nos. 1-7 and Proposed Modification No. 8
[ATTACHMENT WILL APPEAR ON THE FOLLOWING PAGE]

[convene FaasPee
MODIFICATIONOF CONTRACT cancers ese
Fr WoatatonName Freteaveae Fr Rema rRenin FEC
eestiaton No toeFormof aeSoneoster Powns000move
‘Conrac¢FOC?) SeeBock166 eczzz968 cr ionSore
[rama [Aare yaar
DeparomfGeennertalSenos DepartofmGeenenratlSenviees
ConatndParoccremtent Divison CaptalCensruionDison
20V40Se0e thFlor “280 Steet,4For
‘Washington,De208 ‘Wastington,Bc2008
JWa aAineComa. Sealey, Say HalaHEECoy JBRenanen7SacaionNe
DLRGroup is DaeSoaveTH
471hSr9ee, NW,SecondFloor
‘Washington,Dc20018 fA WoateioanCascio
Ena hana@seoroupcom x[ DcaMezo-Ac-o0r8
os. ona(seramay
lavgusts, 2021
TTS TENOR APPLESTOAVEROVERS OFSICATIONS
| Titeairesareesmctaon narandoaastom) lan 1 TahaadesspecsreptotOne=|_[acerca[arated
‘Cesmustcanoe reatoti anancertptthau andSte specie itaelationoraxareabyoneThe
{otowe rethods()8creleers8naneg18,<ndreurirg _1_cpies tneamen)Byackrowecongrece of is
‘mrerdartnachcopy heofrsuber)Byseparate troffaxwhch nos fron totesectatonand
‘erannantnarae:FAILUREOFYOURACKNOWLEDGEMETNOTBERECEANTEToDPLACEDESIGNATEDFORTHERECOEFOIFFPERTS
PRIORTOTHEHOURANDOATESPECIFEDMAYRESULTINREJECTIONOFYOUROFFER. fayvuefh arermentyougear tochange
seofrsreaysuai ichchangemayBeraceby teoff poisedacne elegy makesrlereea ane
fekcaonandhsavenrrt adirecivedpeheropeoningnourand iespeci.
FP Ressringard aprpranonData Reearosh
7 THISTEMAPPLIESONLYTO MODIFICATIONSOFCONTRAGTSTOROERS,
ITMODIFIESTHECONTRACTIORDNEOR.ASDESCRIBEDINITEM14
[RTschangeoversneedpuvarto: SpeeAmory
necranes orninto 14ar made nth oreaclereero. tm108
Is.TeaboverumborecconrectoaesmodtedreeDeseninszavechanges95GFEGS VD STENSSDTIEN
etseattor.n to)4
Ic. TNssuplemanispooner alsariasianoanoF
[>One (aY peofwoaicaonandauTory) Tie27DOWRSedions4725 andConrad!DRMZO-REDOTS
|secion7ChangesClause
JETmPoRTaNT- ~~coneccr [erat [XJregardaaneaocamentan rams 1 copy ng
1 DSSapIGNoTarisnEERITGOCSIGN(OTGSAEST UC GSCIanPROG, PAISTATORBFSTSTWaT SATS]
|FOcNo. DcAN-20-AE-0019 -"DesignBuldSenifcoerAsEServfiorcMePsD andDOCmtooonveJucceiarySquaresherebymodtied
asfotows:
1.Secton3.5oftheContract,ValueofAgreement:TheVaueofAgreementisherebyInceasedtrom$1,575,000by$895,000.00to
s2,170,000.00 te authorizeDLR Group(theAE"to performtheadeitonalseries asdescrptcinPotentialChange Order(PCO).
2.Section3.3,FinalComplationDate:Theflcompletiondate herebyextendedfromMay21,202f3oMay20,2024,
3.Section3.3,AdminstrativeTermDate:TheadminstratvetermdatesherebycomectedfromJanuary 21,2021toJanuary21,2023.
é.Section3.3,AdminstrativeTermDate:Theadmintatverem datesherebyextendedromJanuary21,2025 toAugust20,2024
|s.RELEASE: tismtualygreedthatinexchangeforhisModiandfchceracontsdeoratnon,theContrheraebcyrltaaosers, waives,
seteandhkistheDepartmentharmlessfomanyandalactorupotaentlial aimsordemandsfrdelays, disruptions, ationalwrk,
[action ime,adstonalcost, contractextesions, compensaotrFiaboitny Unadnyteheorry, whetherkaownorunknown, hathe
[ContractormayhavenoworithefutureagainstheDeparmentarising flororoutfasaconsequencesorres of,reating10ornany
|mannerconnectedwihthisMeficton, theabove-referencedProject,andheContractwork
Je.Teme&Condos: AlterTem anContosrainunchanged
ra ansoa Tie SipeimoT TaNa CoSOS
‘aon Surtel
aR TaSa iesnocae aos
Rachel ChungSe 9/22/2022

(Continuation)
ContractNumber Moscation No. PageofPages.
DCAM.20-AE-0019 Moscation No.1 totheFormofContact(FOC) 2012
7.ContractRecap:
Letter Contract Executed: 0172172021 960,000.00
Definitive Contract $625,000.00
ModificationNo.1 $595,000.00
ContractAmount

1. Contract Number Page of Pages
MODIFICATION OF CONTRACT DCAM-20-AE-0019
1 2
2. Modification Number 3. Effective Date 4. Requisition/Purchase Request No. 5. Caption
Architectural/Engineering Services for
Metropolitan Police Department (MPD)
and Department of Corrections (DOC)
Modification No.2 See Block 16C RK238807 Move to One Judiciary Square
6. Issued By: 7. Administered By (If other than line 6)
Department of General Services
Contracting and Procurement Division
2000 14th Street, 4th Floor
Washington, DC 20009
8. Name and Address of Contractor (No. Street, city, country, state and ZIP Code) 9A. Amendment of Solicitation No.
DLR Group 9B. Dated (See Item 11)
701 8th St NW, 7th, F
Washington, D.C. 20001 10A. Modification of Contract/Order No.
Email: rchung@dlrgroup.com X DCAM-20-AE-0019
10B. Dated (See Item 13)
January 21, 2021
11. THIS ITEM ONLY APPLIES TO AMENDMENTS OF SOLICITATIONS
The above numbered solicitation is amended as set forth in Item 14. The hour and date specified for receipt of Offers is extended. is not extended.
Offers must acknowledge receipt of this amendment prior to the hour and date specified in the solicitation or as amended, by one of the
following methods: (a) By completing Items 8 and 15, and returning 1 copies of the amendment: (b) By acknowledging receipt of this
amendment on each copy of the offer submitted; or (c) By separate letter or fax which includes a reference to the solicitation and
amendment number. FAILURE OF YOUR ACKNOWLEDGEMENT TO BE RECEIVED AT THE PLACE DESIGNATED FOR THE RECEIPT OF OFFERS
PRIOR TO THE HOUR AND DATE SPECIFIED MAY RESULT IN REJECTION OF YOUR OFFER. If by virtue of this amendment you desire to change
an offer already submitted, such change may be made by letter or fax, provided each letter or telegram makes reference to the
solicitation and this amendment, and is received prior to the opening hour and date specified.
12. Accounting and Appropriation Data (If Required)
13. THIS ITEM APPLIES ONLY TO MODIFICATIONS OF CONTRACTS/ORDERS,
IT MODIFIES THE CONTRACT/ORDER NO. AS DESCRIBED IN ITEM 14
A. This change order is issued pursuant to: (Specify Authority)
The changes set forth in Item 14 are made in the contract/order no. in item 10A.
B. The above numbered contract/order is modified to reflect the administrative changes (such as changes in paying office, appropriation
date, etc.) set forth in item 14.
C. This supplemental agreement is entered into pursuant to authority of:
D. Other (Specify type of modification and authority) Title 27 DCMR Sections 4728 and Contract DCAM-20-AE-0019
X
E. IMPORTANT: Contractor is not, X is required to sign this document and return 1 copy to the issuing office.
14. Description of amendment/modification (Organized by UCF Section headings, including solicitation/contract subject matter where feasible.)
Contract No.DCAM-20-AE-0019 - Architectural/Engineering Services for Metropolitan Police Department (MPD) and Department of
Corrections (DOC) Move to One Judiciary Square (the“Project”) is hereby modified as follows:
1. Scope of Work: The Scope of Work is hereby revised to provide additional AE services for Daly Building - Phase 1 - Agency Moves and
Swing Spaces to the Marion Barry Building as further described in the attached proposal (Attachment A).
2. Section 3.5 Value of Agreement: The Value of Agreement is hereby increased from $2,170,000.00 to $2,257,600.00 by $87,600.00. In no
events shall the A/E be paid more than $2,257,600.00 unless the A/E is authorized to exceed this limit in advance and in writing by a DGS
Contracting Officer.
3. Terms & Conditions: All other Terms and Conditions remain unchanged.
4. Release: It is mutually agreed that in exchange for this Modification and other considerations, the Contractor hereby releases, waives,
settles and holds the Department harmless from any and all actual or potential claims or demands for delays, disruptions, additional work,
additional time, additional cost, contract extensions, compensations or liability under any theory, whether known or unknown, that the
Contractor may have now or in the future against the Department arising from or out of, as a consequence or result of, relating to or in any
manner connected with this Modification, the above-referenced Project, and the Contract Work.
15A. Name and Title of Signer (Type or print) 16A. Name of Contracting Officer
Rachel Chung, Principal
Obi Ranjbar
15B. DLR Group 15C. Date Signed 16B. District of Columbia 16C. Date Signed
Digitally signed by Rachel Chung
DN: C=US,
Rachel ChungE=rchung@dlrgroup.com, O=DLR
Group, CN=Rachel Chung
Date: 2023.02.16 10:46:49-05'00'
(Signature of person authorized to sign) (Signature of Contracting Officer)

(Continuation)
Contract Number Modification No. Page of Pages
DCAM-20-AE-0019 Modification No. 2 2 of 2
6. Contract Recap:
Letter Contract Contract Executed on: January 21, 2021 $950,000.00
Definitive Contract $625,000.00
Modification No. 1 Increase in Value of Agreement and Time Extension $595,000.00
Modification No. 2 Increase in Value of Agreement $87,600.00
Contract Amount $2,257,600.00

ATTACHMENT A

DLR Group of D.C., P.C.
a District of Columbia professional corporation
701 8th ST NW, 7th F
Washington, D.C. 20001
January 20, 2023
Agyei Hargrove
Executive Program Manager
Public Safety and Justice Portfolio
D.C. Department of General Services
1250 U Street, 2nd Floor
Washington, DC 20009
Email: Agyei.hargrove@dc.gov
Re: Additional Fee and Services Request: Daly Swing Space Project – SCIF
One Judiciary Square (OJS) and 501 NY Avenue (501) Buildings
DLR Group Project No. 55-21101-00
Dear Mr. Hargrove:
On behalf of DLR Group, we are pleased to have been selected and working on the Daly Swing Space Project
with DC Department of General Services (DGS) and the DC Metropolitan Police Department (MPD). DLR
Group has been requested to provide services to complete the SCIF space that was programmed for MPD on
level 6 at OJS. Although this 20x20 space is small, it requires attention at a great detail to meet the
requirements for a S or TS level SCIF.
We have broken down our fees into phases and expenses for your use.
SD Phase $19,950.00
CD Phase $35,900.00
IFC Phase $29,200.00
CA Phase $ 2,300.00
Expenses $ 250.00
Total Fee $87,600.00
Our design is intended to meet the requirements of CD 705, ICS 705-1, ICS 705-2 and ICD 705 Technical
Specifications. Our services are for design phase work including architectural, mechanical, electrical, electronic
security, data, telcom and physical security. Our estimated expenses include internal printing costs. We did not
include any estimated permitting costs or time due to the secure nature of the SCIF and it’s implementation.
DLR Group was also requested to estimate the construction costs for the SCIF. From recent projects, we have
seen cost from $1,250 to $1,500 per square foot for facilities of similar construction. This equates to a
construction cost of between $500,000 and $600,000 for the SCIF. Security requirements, construction
restraints and other technical construction elements impacts including cost increases and supply chain issues
have increased these costs to the levels indicated. Construction costs may be lower if a S type facility is
implemented.

Additional Fee and Services Request: Daly Swing Space Project – SCIF
Page 2
We have looked at a schedule for this work and have added some timeframes in terms of weeks of work for
project execution as follows:
SD Phase – 3 weeks
MPD/DHS/DGS review – 1 week
CD Phase – 3 weeks
MPD/DHS/DGS review – 1 week
IFC Phase – 2 weeks
MPD/DHS/DGS review – 2 days
Update IFC – 2 days
Issue IFC – 1 day
Total estimated weeks: 11 weeks
Thank you again for this opportunity to continue our work with DGS and MPD. We value and appreciate you as
a client and look forward to working with you on this design.
Please let us know if any questions.
Sincerely,
Pete Obarowski, AIA, DBIA
Sr. Associate
DLR Group of DC, P.C.
Encl: N/A
cc: Rachel Chung, DLR Group
Allam Al-Alami, DGS Operations Manager
Marina Khodiaveh, DGS Project Manager

ngiseD
FICS
- tcejorP
gniwS
ylaD
TI/ytiruceS
TI/ytiruceS
rS
.rS
roirednI
roiretnI
.rS
lacinahceM
tcejorP
tcejorP
latoT
lacirtcelE/
lacirtcelE/
lacinahceM
tcetihcrA
lapicnirP
noitpircseD
ksaT
rengiseD
rengiseD
reenignE
tcetihcrA
reganaM
reenignE
reenignE
reenignE
00.002$
00.572$
00.002$
00.003$
00.002$
00.572$
00.002$
00.572$
00.003$
00.053$
setaR
ylruoH
esahP
ngiseD
00.000,1
1
2
noitacifidom
dna
gnitcartnoC
esahP
DS
00.002,1
2
2
)gniteem
1(
gniteeM
SHD
00.059,91
00.057,71
4
2
61
8
61
8
01
8
4
sehcteks
dna
nalp
roolf
tpecnoC
esahP
DC
00.057,1
2
2
2
)gniteem
1(
gniteeM
SHD
00.051,71
4
2
61
8
61
8
01
8
2
snalp
roolF
00.057,31
4
2
8
4
21
8
8
8
4
sliateD
00.009,53
00.052,3
4
4
2
2
E&FF
esahP
CFI
00.006
1
1
)gniteem
1(
gniteeM
SHD
00.057,61
4
2
41
8
61
8
01
8
2
snalp
roolF
00.051,01
4
2
8
4
8
4
8
4
2
sliateD
00.007,1
4
2
E&FF
00.002,92
esahP
AC
00.051,1
2
2
s'IFR
00.003,2
00.051,1
2
2
sgniward
pohS
9
563
0
02
81
26
74
86
83
84
24
02
2
sruoH
latoT
00.053,78
0
0004
0594
00421
00141
00631
05401
0069
05511
0006
007
robaL
latoT
sesnepxE
tceriD
00.052
sesnepxe/gnitnirp/seipoC
00.0
)deriuqer
ton
demussa(
stsoc
gnittimreP
00.006,78
secivreS
esahP
ngiseD
latoT

Jan 24, 2023
James Marshall, (DGS)
Contracts and Procurement
Department of General Services
2000 14th Street, NW 4th Floor
Washington, DC 20009
Reference: DALY BUILDING SWING TO MBB (OJS) DCAM-20-AE-0019
Subject: CAA Space at MBB 6th level Justification memo
Dear James Marshall,
This memo is a formal request on behalf of the DC Metropolitan Police Department (MPD) to
provide Additional AE services to complete the Sensitive Compartmented Information Facility
(SCIF) – An accredited room, a designated space (CAA) for secure communications at level 6th at
MBB.
CAA requirement involves materials & equipment selections, and special installation where
sensitive information may be stored, used, discussed, and/or electronically processed. The AE
services includes meeting with security team, concept design, engineering requirement and
completing construction documents to meet the DHS & MPD requirements for a S or TS level
SCIF.
The AE design service fee for the above request would be $87,600.00.
TThhaannkk yyoouu,,
MMaarriinnaa KKhhooddiiaavveehh
Project Manager/ DGS
CC: Agyei Hargrove, EPM
Government of the District of Columbia
DepartmentofGeneralServices | dgs.dc.gov
@dcdgs
200014thStreetNW,8thFloor,Washington,DC20009

(cid:20)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:85) (cid:51)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:51)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:86)
(cid:48)(cid:50)(cid:39)(cid:44)(cid:41)(cid:44)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:55)(cid:44)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:55)(cid:53)(cid:36)(cid:38)(cid:55)
(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:48)(cid:16)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:16)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:16)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28)
(cid:20) (cid:21)
(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:85) (cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:40)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72) (cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:72)(cid:84)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:18)(cid:51)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:72)(cid:84)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17) (cid:24)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:68)(cid:83)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)
(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:79)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)
(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:88)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)
(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:22) (cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:79)(cid:82)(cid:70)(cid:78)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:25)(cid:38) (cid:53)(cid:46)(cid:21)(cid:24)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:25)(cid:23) (cid:38)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:70)(cid:88)(cid:79)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)
(cid:25)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:86)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:92)(cid:29) (cid:26)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:44)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:25)(cid:12)
(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:72)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:42)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:86) (cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:72)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:42)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:86)
(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:51)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:70)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81) (cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:68)(cid:83)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:88)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)
(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:28)(cid:21)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:24)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:79)(cid:82)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:17) (cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:28)(cid:21)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:24)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:79)(cid:82)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:17)
(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:58)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28) (cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:58)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28)
(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:71)(cid:71)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:92)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:92)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:61)(cid:44)(cid:51)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:12) (cid:28)(cid:36)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)
(cid:39)(cid:47)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:42)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:83) (cid:28)(cid:37)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:20)(cid:12)
(cid:26)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:58)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:19)(cid:19)
(cid:58)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20) (cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:36)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:18)(cid:50)(cid:85)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)
(cid:36)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:81)(cid:29)(cid:53)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:75)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:74) (cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:48)(cid:16)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:16)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:16)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28)
(cid:59)
(cid:40)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:76)(cid:79)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:35)(cid:71)(cid:79)(cid:85)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:83)(cid:17)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:80) (cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:37)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:12)
(cid:45)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:21)(cid:20)
(cid:20)(cid:20)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:43)(cid:44)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:55)(cid:40)(cid:48)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:47)(cid:60)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:51)(cid:51)(cid:47)(cid:44)(cid:40)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:50)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:48)(cid:40)(cid:49)(cid:39)(cid:48)(cid:40)(cid:49)(cid:55)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:50)(cid:47)(cid:44)(cid:38)(cid:44)(cid:55)(cid:36)(cid:55)(cid:44)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:54)
(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:69)(cid:82)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:76)(cid:83)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:86) (cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:91)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:17) (cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:91)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:17)
(cid:50)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:88)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:78)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:76)(cid:83)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)
(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:79)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:86)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:68)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:80)(cid:83)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:24)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:81)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74) (cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:83)(cid:76)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:69)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:78)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:74)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:76)(cid:83)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)
(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:83)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:69)(cid:80)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:30)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:70)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:68)(cid:91)(cid:3)(cid:90)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)
(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:41)(cid:36)(cid:44)(cid:47)(cid:56)(cid:53)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:60)(cid:50)(cid:56)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:38)(cid:46)(cid:49)(cid:50)(cid:58)(cid:47)(cid:40)(cid:39)(cid:42)(cid:40)(cid:48)(cid:40)(cid:49)(cid:55)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:50)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:40)(cid:38)(cid:40)(cid:44)(cid:57)(cid:40)(cid:39)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:55)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:43)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:51)(cid:47)(cid:36)(cid:38)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:40)(cid:54)(cid:44)(cid:42)(cid:49)(cid:36)(cid:55)(cid:40)(cid:39)(cid:3)(cid:41)(cid:50)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:43)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:40)(cid:38)(cid:40)(cid:44)(cid:51)(cid:55)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:41)(cid:40)(cid:53)(cid:54)
(cid:51)(cid:53)(cid:44)(cid:50)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:50)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:43)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:43)(cid:50)(cid:56)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:49)(cid:39)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:36)(cid:55)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:51)(cid:40)(cid:38)(cid:44)(cid:41)(cid:44)(cid:40)(cid:39)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:36)(cid:60)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:40)(cid:54)(cid:56)(cid:47)(cid:55)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:49)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:40)(cid:45)(cid:40)(cid:38)(cid:55)(cid:44)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:60)(cid:50)(cid:56)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:41)(cid:40)(cid:53)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:92)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)
(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:69)(cid:80)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:68)(cid:91)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:78)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)
(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:17)
(cid:20)(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:70)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:83)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:44)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:72)(cid:84)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:12)
(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:43)(cid:44)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:55)(cid:40)(cid:48)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:51)(cid:51)(cid:47)(cid:44)(cid:40)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:47)(cid:60)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:50)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:50)(cid:39)(cid:44)(cid:41)(cid:44)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:55)(cid:44)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:55)(cid:53)(cid:36)(cid:38)(cid:55)(cid:54)(cid:18)(cid:50)(cid:53)(cid:39)(cid:40)(cid:53)(cid:54)(cid:15)
(cid:44)(cid:55)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:50)(cid:39)(cid:44)(cid:41)(cid:44)(cid:40)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:43)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:50)(cid:49)(cid:55)(cid:53)(cid:36)(cid:38)(cid:55)(cid:18)(cid:50)(cid:53)(cid:39)(cid:40)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:50)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:54)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:40)(cid:54)(cid:38)(cid:53)(cid:44)(cid:37)(cid:40)(cid:39)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:49)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:55)(cid:40)(cid:48)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:23)
(cid:36)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:54)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:92)(cid:12)(cid:3)
(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:18)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:36)(cid:17)
(cid:37)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:69)(cid:82)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:18)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:73)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:92)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:83)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)
(cid:71)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:70)(cid:17)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:17)
(cid:38)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:83)(cid:83)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:29)
(cid:39)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:54)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:92)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:92)(cid:12) (cid:55)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:48)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:26)(cid:21)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:48)(cid:16)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:16)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:16)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28)(cid:17)
(cid:59)
(cid:40)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:48)(cid:51)(cid:50)(cid:53)(cid:55)(cid:36)(cid:49)(cid:55)(cid:29) (cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85) (cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:15) (cid:10)(cid:59) (cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:84)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:82)(cid:70)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:81) (cid:20) (cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:83)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:17)
(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:83)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:18)(cid:80)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:50)(cid:85)(cid:74)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:76)(cid:93)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:56)(cid:38)(cid:41)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:18)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:69)(cid:77)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:90)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:69)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:17)(cid:12)
(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:48)(cid:16)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:16)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:16)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:28)(cid:24)(cid:16)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:37)(cid:88)(cid:76)(cid:79)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:88)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:70)(cid:88)(cid:79)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:77)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:3)
(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:79)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:86)(cid:29)(cid:3)
(cid:20)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:51)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:10)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:89)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:24)(cid:26)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:21)(cid:28)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:27)(cid:25)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:93)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:47)(cid:53)(cid:3)
(cid:42)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:83)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:55)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:89)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:11)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:12)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)
(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:76)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:27)(cid:25)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:93)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:91)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:80)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:89)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:90)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:42)(cid:54)(cid:3)
(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:17)(cid:3)
(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:80)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:79)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:80)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:17)
(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:40)(cid:47)(cid:40)(cid:36)(cid:54)(cid:40)(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:44)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:79)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:91)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:69)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)
(cid:90)(cid:68)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:71)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:72)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:80)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:79)(cid:68)(cid:76)(cid:80)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:79)(cid:68)(cid:92)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:85)(cid:88)(cid:83)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)
(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:90)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:78)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:71)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:72)(cid:91)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:80)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:68)(cid:69)(cid:76)(cid:79)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:92)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:90)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:78)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)
(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:78)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:81)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:75)(cid:68)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:81)(cid:82)(cid:90)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:68)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:72)(cid:83)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:87)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:73)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:80)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:84)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:86)(cid:88)(cid:79)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:15)(cid:3)
(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:79)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:80)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:70)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:90)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:3)(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:69)(cid:82)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:16)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:73)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:51)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:77)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:58)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:78)(cid:17)
(cid:20)(cid:24)(cid:36)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:79)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:55)(cid:92)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:12) (cid:20)(cid:25)(cid:36)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:68)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:85)
(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:75)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:74) (cid:46)(cid:76)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:83)(cid:75)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:71)(cid:3)
(cid:20)(cid:24)(cid:37)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:47)(cid:53)(cid:3)(cid:42)(cid:85)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:83) (cid:20)(cid:24)(cid:38)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:71) (cid:20)(cid:25)(cid:37)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:76)(cid:86)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:80)(cid:69)(cid:76)(cid:68) (cid:20)(cid:25)(cid:38)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:39)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:54)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:72)(cid:71)
(cid:11)(cid:54)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:83)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:86)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:75)(cid:82)(cid:85)(cid:76)(cid:93)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:87)(cid:82)(cid:3)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:12) (cid:11)(cid:54)(cid:76)(cid:74)(cid:81)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:74)(cid:3)(cid:50)(cid:73)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:12)

(cid:11)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:12)
(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87) (cid:51)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:51)(cid:68)(cid:74)(cid:72)(cid:86)
(cid:39)(cid:38)(cid:36)(cid:48)(cid:16)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:16)(cid:36)(cid:40)(cid:16)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:28)
(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:22) (cid:21)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:21)
(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:53)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:83)
(cid:47)(cid:72)(cid:87)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:85)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3) (cid:40)(cid:91)(cid:72)(cid:70)(cid:88)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:45)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:88)(cid:68)(cid:85)(cid:92)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:21)(cid:20) (cid:7)(cid:28)(cid:24)(cid:19)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)
(cid:39)(cid:72)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:81)(cid:76)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:89)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87) (cid:7)(cid:25)(cid:21)(cid:24)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)
(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:20) (cid:44)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:57)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:68)(cid:81)(cid:71)(cid:3)(cid:55)(cid:76)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:40)(cid:91)(cid:87)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:86)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81) (cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:28)(cid:24)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)
(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:21) (cid:44)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:57)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87) (cid:7)(cid:27)(cid:26)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:19)(cid:19)
(cid:48)(cid:82)(cid:71)(cid:76)(cid:73)(cid:76)(cid:70)(cid:68)(cid:87)(cid:76)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:3)(cid:49)(cid:82)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:22) (cid:44)(cid:81)(cid:70)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:68)(cid:86)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:57)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:88)(cid:72)(cid:3)(cid:82)(cid:73)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:74)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:72)(cid:80)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:88)(cid:85)(cid:85)(cid:72)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:12) (cid:7)(cid:21)(cid:28)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:19)
(cid:55)(cid:82)(cid:87)(cid:68)(cid:79)(cid:3)(cid:38)(cid:82)(cid:81)(cid:87)(cid:85)(cid:68)(cid:70)(cid:87)(cid:3)(cid:36)(cid:80)(cid:82)(cid:88)(cid:81)(cid:87) (cid:936)(cid:1006)(cid:853)(cid:1006)(cid:1012)(cid:1010)(cid:853)(cid:1010)(cid:1004)(cid:1004)(cid:856)(cid:1004)(cid:1004)

September 10 23
Supervisory Contract Specialist
Contracts and Procurement
Department of General Services
3924 Minnesota Ave NE
Washington, DC 20019
Reference: DALY BUILDING SWING TO MBB (OJS)
Contract Number: DCAM-20-AE-0019
PO639643 & PO672048 - AE SERVICES
Subject: Change Order Justification DLR Group
Dear Contract Officer,
This Letter is a written explanation that previously structural analysis and calculation was not included to
accommodate the new diesel roof generator. The delegated design will be performed by City
Construction. The structural survey was not conducted during the design phase. To support the
installation of the new generator, and dunnage design the structural calculation and survey needs to be
provided to the general contractor.
The anticipated change request cost was $40,000, which was negotiated to $29,000. Kindly consider this
request.
Thank you,
Marina Khodiaveh
Project Manager/DG
CC: Agyei Hargrove EPM
Government of the District of Columbia
Department of General Services | dgs.dc.gov
@dcdgs
3924 Minnesota Ave NE, 5th Floor, Washington, DC

29 August 2023
Marina Khodiaveh
DGS
Daly Swing – 441 Structural Building Review and Capacity Calculations
Marina,
As requested, DLR offers the following work effort for structural analysis.
Site visit (contract noted that columns are visible on 5, 6 and 11…would like to see every floor if
possible)
1 person at 8 hours on site plus 8 hours of travel each = 16 hours (lowered from 32 hours)
plus expenses ($1500/day x 1 = $1500)
Calculations = 60 hours (lowered from 80 hours)
Review of dunnage = 20 hours (lowered from 24 hours)
Letter = 8 hours (reduced from Report = 16 hours)
Total hours 104 hours at $250/hr = $26,000
Expenses = $1500
Contingency (5%) = $1500 (lowered from 10%)
Total estimate = $29,000
This will exclude any details of dunnage connections to the roof, roofing details, etc.
It will be based upon code minimum reinforcing standards of the era of 441 (trying to get drawings
from DOB)
Any destructive or removal of finishes/ceilings to allow access to columns (for measurements)…this
would be by City
City to provide support for structural site visit (remove finishes, provide ladders, flashlights, etc.)
We would be able to come for the site visit on 8.29 with any follow up on 8.30.
Please confirm that these costs are acceptable and we’ll prepare a PCO and make our trip next
week.
Best,
PPete Obarowski, AIA, DBIA
Architect | Principal
pobarowski@dlrgroup.com
DDLR Group
o: 202-393-6 445 | d: 202-407-8782 | m: 703-409-1262
701 8th Street NW, Suite 700 Washington, DC 20001

3.29.24
Kianna Shepherd

(Continuation)
Modificationof Contract Page of Pages
DCAM-20-AE-0019 ModiicationNo.4 ot?
4.ContractRecap
LetterContract ExecutedonJanuary21, 2021 $950,000.00
DefintiveContract ‘$625,000
‘Medication No. 1 IncValrueoefAagresemeentandTineExtension $595,000.00,
ModificationNo, 2 IncreaseValueofAgroement 87,600
MosicationNo, 3 IncreaseValue ofAgreement $29,000.00
MoccatonNo.4 IncreaseValueofAgree{mCuerrnentt) $188,950.00
TotalContractAmount 55000

Daly Building Swing Space Renovation Project .
5/9/24

(Continuation)
ModificationofContract PageofPages,
DCAM-20-AE-0019 Mosiication Nos oot?
5.ContractRecap
LetterContract ExeconuJantuaeryd21,2021 950,000.00
DetntiveContract '8625,000
MosiicatonNo,+ IncreaseValueofAgreementandTimeExtension $595,000.00
MosiicationNo,2 IncreaseValueofAgreement ‘887,600
MosiicationNo.3 IncreaseValveofAgreement $29,000.00
MoaiticationNo,4 IncreaseValueofAgreement $158,950.00
MoaicatonNo.5 TimeExtension
ExtendedFinalCompletionDatefom5/20/24o720/25.
ExtendedAdministrativecompledattieforonm 8/20/24to8/20/25
“otalContractAmount TEASSORT

1. Contract Number Page of Pages
DCAM-20-AE-0019
MODIFICATION OF CONTRACT
1 2
2. Modification Number 3. Effective Date 4. Requisition/Purchase Request No. 5. Caption
Daly Building Reno. A&E Design
and CA services for Daly Swing
441 4th St NW and 501 NY Ave
Modification No.6 See Block 16C RK282064/ PR013337
6. Issued By: 7. Administered By (If other than line 6)
Department of General Services Department of General Services
Contracting and Procurement Division Capital Construction Division
3924 Minnesota Ave, 5th floor. 3924 Minnesota Ave, 5th floor.
Washington, DC 20019 Washington, DC 20019
8. Name and Address of Contractor (No. Street, city, country, state and ZIP Code) 9A. Amendment of Solicitation No.
DLR Group of DC, P.C 9B. Dated (See Item 11)
701 8th Street NW, Suit 700
Washington, DC 20001 10A. Modification of Contract/Order No.
Attn:Rachel Chung DCAM-20-AE-0019
X
Email: rchung@dlrgroup.com 10B. Dated (See Item 13)
January 21, 2021
11. THIS ITEM ONLY APPLIES TO AMENDMENTS OF SOLICITATIONS
The above numbered solicitation is amended as set forth in Item 14. The hour and date specified for receipt of Offers is extended. is not extended.
Offers must acknowledge receipt of this amendment prior to the hour and date specified in the solicitation or as amended, by one of the
following methods: (a) By completing Items 8 and 15, and returning copies of the amendment: (b) By acknowledging receipt of this
amendment on each copy of the offer submitted; or (c) By separate letter or fax which includes a reference to the solicitation and
amendment number. FAILURE OF YOUR ACKNOWLEDGEMENT TO BE RECEIVED AT THE PLACE DESIGNATED FOR THE RECEIPT OF OFFERS
PRIOR TO THE HOUR AND DATE SPECIFIED MAY RESULT IN REJECTION OF YOUR OFFER. If by virtue of this amendment you desire to change
an offer already submitted, such change may be made by letter or fax, provided each letter or telegram makes reference to the
solicitation and this amendment, and is received prior to the opening hour and date specified.
12. Accounting and Appropriation Data (If Required)
13. THIS ITEM APPLIES ONLY TO MODIFICATIONS OF CONTRACTS/ORDERS,
IT MODIFIES THE CONTRACT/ORDER NO. AS DESCRIBED IN ITEM 14
A. This change order is issued pursuant to: (Specify Authority)
The changes set forth in Item 14 are made in the contract/order no. in item 10A.
B. The above numbered contract/order is modified to reflect the administrative changes (such as changes in paying office, appropriation
date, etc.) set forth in item 14.
C. This supplemental agreement is entered into pursuant to authority of:
D. Other (Specify type of modification and authority) Title 27 DCMR Sections 4728 and Contract DCAM-20-AE-0019.
X
E. IMPORTANT: Contractor is not, 'X is required to sign this document and return 1 copy to the issuing office.
14. Description of amendment/modification (Organized by UCF Section headings, including solicitation/contract subject matter where feasible.)
DCAM-20-AE-0019 - Daly Building Renovation A& E Design and Construction Administration ("CA") services for Daly Swing 441 4th St
NW and 501 NY Ave("the project") is hereby modified as follows:
1.
services to accommodate a newly allocated 1,500 square foot museum space in the Marion Barry Building, in accordance with the
Change Order hereby attached as Exhibit A.
2. As a result of the additional scope outlined in this Modification No. 6, Box 14, Item 1, the total not-to-exceed value of the contract is
hereby increased from $2,445,550.00 by +$72,125.00 to $2,517,675.00. In no event shall the contractor be paid more than
$2,517,675.00 unless the Contractor is authorized to exceed this limit in advance and in writing by DGS Contracting Officer.
3. Terms & Conditions: All other Terms and Conditions remain unchanged.
4. RELEASE: It is mutually agreed that in exchange for this Modification and other considerations, the Contractor hereby releases,
waives, settles, and holds the Department harmless from any and all actual or potential claims or demands for delays, disruptions,
additional work, additional time, additional cost, contract extensions, compensations or liability under any theory, whether known or
unknown, that the Contractor may have now or in the future against the Department arising from or out of, as a consequence or result of,
relating to or in any manner connected with this Modification, the above-referenced Project, and the Contract Work.
15A. Name and Title of Signer (Type or print) 16A. Name of Contracting Officer
Rachel Chung Kianna Shepherd
15B. DLR Group of DC, P.C 15C. Date Signed 16B. District of Columbia 16C. Date Signed
8/14/2024
Eric Njonjo
(Signature of person authorized to sign) (Signature of Contracting Officer)

(Continuation)
Page of Pages
Modification of Contract
DCAM-20-AE-0019 Modification No.6
2 of 2
5. Contract Recap
Letter Contract Executed on January 21, 2021 $950,000.00
Definitive Contract $625,000
Modification No. 1 Increase Value of Agreement and Time Extension $595,000.00
Modification No. 2 Increase Value of Agreement $87,600
Modification No. 3 Increase Value of Agreement $29,000.00
Modification No. 4 Increase Value of Agreement $158,950.00
Modification No. 5 Time Extension - Extended Final Completion Date from 5/20/24 to 7/20/25; $0.00
Extended the Administrative Completion Date from 8/20/24 to 8/20/25.
Modification No. 6 Add/Incorporate additional scope and Increase Value of Agreement $72,125.00
Total Contract Amount $2,517,675.00

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES
EXHIBIT A
CHANGE ORDER
[ATTACHMENT WILL APPEAR ON THE FOLLOWING PAGE]

(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:14)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:8)(cid:19)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:0) (cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:24)(cid:0)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:23)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:0) !(cid:22)"#(cid:0)$(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:0)%(cid:30)#(cid:29)&(cid:24)(cid:0)’()#"(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:29)(cid:28)(cid:0)*+(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:0)*,(cid:22)&#"(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:0)--$(cid:0)-.!(cid:0)*.(cid:0)/0(cid:0)
123(cid:0)4(cid:20)(cid:0) (cid:21)5*(cid:31)666678(cid:31)9:/;(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:14)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:4)(cid:0)1(cid:15)(cid:15)(cid:14)(cid:5)<<(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:0)=66(cid:0)>(cid:29)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:29)(cid:22)(cid:0)%)#(cid:29)(cid:26)#?(cid:0)/0(cid:0)
’()(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:0).((cid:0)--$(cid:0)-.!(cid:0)*@(cid:0)/0(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:0)4(cid:0) (cid:0) (cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:0)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:15)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:0)
3(cid:7)(cid:4)(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:0) %A:(cid:0)*#B)(cid:27)&#"(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:0)’ (cid:21)(cid:0)’(cid:26)"#(cid:26)C(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:0)D(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0) EA$FAG6G-(cid:0)
D(cid:5)<(cid:17)(cid:14)(cid:7)H(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:3)I(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:0) (cid:0)
2(cid:17)(cid:3)H(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:3)I(cid:0)J(cid:3)(cid:14)K(cid:0) @!#(cid:0)&(cid:23)(cid:27)#(cid:29).(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:30)#(cid:29)&(cid:24)?(cid:0).!#(cid:0)’#.B(,((cid:23)(cid:27).(cid:22)(cid:29)(cid:0) ((cid:23)(cid:27)&#(cid:0)(cid:21)#,(cid:22)B.C#(cid:29).(cid:0)L’ (cid:21)M?(cid:0)!(cid:22)"(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:23)(&(cid:22).#(cid:28)(cid:0)
(cid:22),,B(N(cid:27)C(cid:22).#(cid:23)(cid:24)(cid:0)$?866(cid:0)"O(cid:26)(cid:22)B#(cid:0)P##.(cid:0)(P(cid:0)",(cid:22)&#(cid:0)+(cid:27).!(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:0).!#(cid:0)’(cid:22)B(cid:27)((cid:29)(cid:0)(cid:25)(cid:22)BB(cid:24)(cid:0)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:23)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:0)
P(B(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:0)C(cid:26)"#(cid:26)C(cid:0)",(cid:22)&#Q(cid:0)@!#(cid:0)C(cid:26)"#(cid:26)C(cid:0)+(cid:27)(cid:23)(cid:23)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:27)",(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:24)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:0))(cid:22)B(cid:27)#.(cid:24)(cid:0)(P(cid:0)’ (cid:21)(cid:0)(cid:22)B.(cid:27)P(cid:22)&."Q(cid:0)
@!(cid:27)"(cid:0)C((cid:28)(cid:27)P(cid:27)&(cid:22).(cid:27)((cid:29)(cid:0).((cid:0).!#(cid:0)&((cid:29).B(cid:22)&.(cid:0)(cid:27)"(cid:0).((cid:0),B()(cid:27)(cid:28)#(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:28)(cid:28)(cid:27).(cid:27)((cid:29)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)%A:(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:29)(cid:28)(cid:0)
&((cid:29)".B(cid:26)&.(cid:27)((cid:29)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:28)C(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:27)".B(cid:22).(cid:27))#(cid:0)"#B)(cid:27)&#"Q(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:0)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:0)R(cid:5)(cid:8)<(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:14)(cid:3)H(cid:3)<(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:10)(cid:3)<(cid:4)(cid:0) SEG?$G8Q66(cid:0)
1(cid:17)K(cid:6)(cid:3)T(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:10)(cid:3)<(cid:4)(cid:0) SEG?$G8Q66(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:14)(cid:3)H(cid:3)<(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)2(cid:17)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:15)U(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:0) (cid:0)
V(cid:19)H(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:4)(cid:0)WD(cid:8)X<Y(cid:0)
1(cid:17)K(cid:6)(cid:3)T(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)2(cid:17)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:15)U(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:0) (cid:0)
V(cid:19)H(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:4)(cid:0)WD(cid:8)X<Y(cid:0)
R(cid:5)ZU(cid:5)<(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)R(cid:5)[(cid:7)<(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0) (cid:0)
2U\<(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:0)(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:19)H(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0)
D(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0)
R(cid:5)ZU(cid:5)<(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)R(cid:5)[(cid:7)<(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:0)](cid:7)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:0) (cid:0)
(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:19)H(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0)D(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0)
^U<(cid:4)(cid:7)I(cid:7)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0) (cid:0)
_(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0) (cid:0)
(cid:0)
D(cid:14)(cid:8)T(cid:7)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:0)R(cid:5)I(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:0)
DT(cid:12)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:3)‘(cid:0) 3(cid:7)(cid:4)(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:0) R(cid:5)[‘(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:3)‘(cid:0) R(cid:5)[‘(cid:0)D(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0)
(cid:0)
2H(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:7)I(cid:7)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0)R(cid:5)I(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:0)
2H(cid:5)(cid:17)‘(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:3)‘(cid:0) 3(cid:7)(cid:4)(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:0) R(cid:5)[‘(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:3)‘(cid:0) R(cid:5)[‘(cid:0)D(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0)
(cid:0)
Da2(cid:0)D(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:19)(cid:7)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:0) %&b(cid:29)(+(cid:23)#(cid:28)(cid:30)#(cid:28)(cid:0)
Vac(cid:0)(cid:10)(cid:3)<(cid:4)(cid:0) SE8?866Q66(cid:0)
V(cid:6)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:0)R(cid:5)[(cid:7)(cid:5)T(cid:0) (cid:0)
(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:4)<(cid:0)

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:7) (cid:7)
(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:13)(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:7) (cid:7)
(cid:7)
(cid:7)

(cid:0)
(cid:0)
$% $%
(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:11)(cid:13)(cid:0)(cid:14)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:11)(cid:0)
(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)(cid:24)(cid:22)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:18)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:29)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)
!"(cid:0)#(cid:0)&’(cid:0)()*(cid:0) (cid:0)+(cid:0)
),-%./0$1/*(cid:0)2343(cid:0)(cid:0)5!!!"(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
67(cid:0)8(cid:26)(cid:25)9(cid:0)6:6;(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
<=9(cid:30)(cid:17)(cid:0)>(cid:15)(cid:20)=(cid:20)(cid:22)?(cid:30)(cid:0) (cid:19)J
@A(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:19)(cid:17)?(cid:30)(cid:0)B(cid:20)(cid:22)=(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:0)C(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:15)=(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:0)
B(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:25)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:0)D(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:19)9(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)8(cid:26)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)B(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:25)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:0)
7F6;(cid:0)C(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:22)(cid:19)(cid:15)(cid:0)<?(cid:30)(cid:0)G@H(cid:0)I(cid:0)K(cid:25)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)
L(cid:15)(cid:18)J(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:31)H(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:24)(cid:0)6::MF(cid:0)
@(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:17)(cid:25)N(cid:0)(cid:0)<=9(cid:30)(cid:17)OJ(cid:15)(cid:20)=(cid:20)(cid:22)?(cid:30)PE(cid:21)O=(cid:22)?(cid:0)
(cid:0) (cid:19)J
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
Q(cid:30)N(cid:0) <EE(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:0)D(cid:21)J(cid:30)E(cid:26)(cid:25)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)D(cid:30)(cid:20)?(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:0)Q(cid:30)R(cid:26)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:19)N(cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:25)9(cid:0)DS(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)D(cid:29)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)B(cid:20)(cid:22)T(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:0)U(cid:0)C(cid:26)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:17)=(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)MM(cid:0)K(cid:25)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)
(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)CVV(cid:0)
(cid:0) ;;M(cid:0)W(cid:31)E(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:15)(cid:0)<?(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:26)(cid:30)(cid:0)
(cid:0) (cid:16)XQ(cid:0)Y(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:29)(cid:0)B(cid:20)(cid:22)T(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:0)G(cid:22)O(cid:0)IIZ6MM:MZ::(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:16)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:0)C(cid:20)O(cid:0)>(cid:15)(cid:20)=(cid:20)(cid:22)?(cid:30)N(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
L(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:0)J(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:25)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:26)(cid:30)(cid:0)S(cid:22)(cid:20)[(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:25)9(cid:0)DS(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)D(cid:29)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)B(cid:20)(cid:22)T(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:19)J(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:24)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:30)(cid:29)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)Y(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:0)D(cid:30)(cid:20)?(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:0)
\(cid:16)YD](cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:24)(cid:0)C(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:29)(cid:22)(cid:25)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:0)B(cid:22)(cid:25)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:30)(cid:29)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:0)\CB(cid:16)]O(cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:16)XQ(cid:0)Y(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:29)(cid:0)S(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:30)R(cid:26)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:20)(cid:22)?(cid:17)E(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)
(cid:29)(cid:20)(cid:22)?(cid:17)E(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)E(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:17)=(cid:31)(cid:0)\(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:20)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:25)9(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:29)(cid:29)(cid:20)(cid:22)?(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:25)(cid:15)9(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:19)](cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:26)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)E(cid:22)(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)CB(cid:16)(cid:0)C(cid:26)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:29)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)
MM(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:25)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)CVVO(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:16)XQ(cid:0)Y(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:29)(cid:0)J(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:26)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)S(cid:22)(cid:20)[(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:19)J(cid:0)CB(cid:16)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:16)YD(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)E(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:17)=(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:15)EE(cid:30)E(cid:0)CB(cid:16)(cid:0)C(cid:26)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:26)(cid:27)O(cid:0)(cid:0)L(cid:30)(cid:0)J(cid:15)?(cid:30)(cid:0)
S(cid:22)(cid:20)[(cid:30)E(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:19)J(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:16)YD(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:20)(cid:22)T(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:15)=(cid:30)(cid:20)H(cid:0)8(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:18)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:0)X(cid:26)==H(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:25)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:21)J(cid:30)E(cid:26)(cid:25)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:29)(cid:25)(cid:30)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:0)
(cid:18)(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:18)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)E(cid:22)(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:0)S(cid:30)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:26)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)E(cid:22)(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)SJ(cid:17)(cid:21)J(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:30)(cid:31)E(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:30)(cid:0)=(cid:17)?(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)
(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:15)E9(cid:0)S(cid:22)(cid:20)[(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:19)J(cid:0)(cid:16)YD(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:0)CVVO(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
D(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:0)
(cid:16)XQ(cid:0)Y(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:29)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:20)(cid:22)E(cid:26)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:26)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)E(cid:22)(cid:21)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:21)J(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:26)(cid:20)(cid:30)H(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:17)(cid:18)J(cid:30)(cid:18)H(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:21)J(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:0)>^<(cid:24)(cid:0)\(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:0)
(cid:29)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:31)=]H(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:30)(cid:25)(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:25)O(cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:20)(cid:15)S(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:18)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)E(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:25)(cid:22)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)E(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:15)_W‘(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:19)(cid:25)(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:26)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:22)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)T(cid:26)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:30)(cid:0)
T(cid:26)(cid:31)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:22)A(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:19)J(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:26)(cid:28)Z(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:20)E(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:28)9(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:16)YD(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:18)_(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:18)(cid:0)\(cid:18)(cid:26)(cid:21)J(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:0)CB(cid:16)H(cid:0)a(cid:24)‘aH(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:26)(cid:17)(cid:25)E(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)
(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:15)=(cid:30)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)H(cid:0)‘J(cid:30)(cid:0)E(cid:20)(cid:15)S(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:25)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:31)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:26)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:0)b(cid:18)J(cid:30)(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:18)c(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:0)=(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)
(cid:20)(cid:30)R(cid:26)(cid:17)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:27)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)E(cid:20)(cid:15)S(cid:17)(cid:31)=(cid:0)(cid:18)J(cid:30)(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:26)(cid:15)(cid:25)O(cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:17)?(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0):M(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:21)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:21)(cid:25)(cid:26)E(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:0)
(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:28)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:27)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:28)9(cid:0)(cid:16)YDO(cid:0)(cid:0)(cid:16)XQ(cid:0)Y(cid:20)(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:29)(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:19)J(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:18)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:21)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:0)(cid:16)YDH(cid:0)S(cid:17)(cid:25)(cid:25)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:30)(cid:19)(cid:0)
\(cid:27)(cid:22)E(cid:17)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)](cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:16)aVO(cid:0)(cid:0)C(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:0)J(cid:22)(cid:26)(cid:20)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:19)J(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:18)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:31)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:31)E(cid:0)(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:20)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:0)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:15)(cid:20)(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:19)(cid:30)E(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:0)
(cid:19)J(cid:30)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:30)O(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:0)(cid:9)(cid:3) (cid:23)(cid:30)
(cid:3)
(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:28)(cid:11)(cid:28)(cid:7)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:14)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:15)(cid:6)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:29)(cid:16)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:30)(cid:18)(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:19)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:21)(cid:3)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:22)(cid:27)(cid:5)(cid:28)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:29)(cid:13)(cid:18)(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:24)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:11)(cid:3)(cid:16) (cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:25)!(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:15)(cid:23)"(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:15)#(cid:11)(cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:29)$(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:3)(cid:29)%(cid:15)(cid:22)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:24)(cid:16)(cid:17)&(cid:12)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:3)’(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:5)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:5)(cid:25)(cid:3)#(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:13)(cid:11)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(((cid:3))(cid:6)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)(cid:26)++(cid:3)
(cid:24)(cid:15)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:0)(cid:3)
(cid:3)(cid:29)(cid:22)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:3)
,(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)%(cid:6)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:27)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)$(cid:17)(cid:16)-(cid:3)$(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:28)(cid:3).(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:3)/01(cid:3)2#(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:28)(cid:7)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:24)#(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:3)#3(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)$(cid:12)(cid:12)-(cid:3)
(cid:17)*(cid:3)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:3)((cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:0)(cid:9)4(cid:3)(cid:3),(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)/01(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:3)$(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:3).(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:5).(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:24)#(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:3)#3(cid:29)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:3)$(cid:12)(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:5).(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)#5+(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)
%(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$4(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:24)#(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:3)#3(cid:29)(cid:3)$(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:16)(cid:15)$(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:31)(cid:3)$(cid:30)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:3)%(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:11)6#5+(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$4(cid:3)(cid:3)7(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:31)(cid:3)
(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:13)%(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$(cid:3)%(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:28)(cid:31)(cid:3)$(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:3).(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:16)(cid:15)$(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:3).(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:31)(cid:31)(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)#3(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)*(cid:13)(cid:16)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:3)
$(cid:12)(cid:12)-(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)(cid:29)(cid:12)%(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:25).(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:3)8$(cid:12)(cid:12)-(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)94(cid:0)4(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:0)(cid:9):4(cid:3)
(cid:3)
)(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:3)
(cid:10)(cid:23)(cid:23)(cid:15)(cid:22)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:31)%(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:28)(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:25)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:30)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:16)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)%(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:28)(cid:5)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:22)(cid:5)(cid:25)(cid:12)(cid:27)(cid:23)(cid:31)4(cid:3)(cid:3)
;(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:25)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:3)*(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)</(cid:0)(cid:19)((cid:0)0(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:17)%(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)$(cid:17)(cid:16)-(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:22)(cid:16)(cid:13).(cid:12)(cid:28)4(cid:3)(cid:3),(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:13)*(cid:7)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)*(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:5)(cid:28)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)
#5+(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:31)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)%(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)%(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:12)$(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:17)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:5)(cid:28)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:25)%(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:13)(cid:11)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:22)(cid:5)(cid:16)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)6(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:28)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:15)67,(cid:3)
(cid:27)(cid:12)(cid:23)$(cid:17)(cid:16)-4(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:31)(cid:3)-(cid:27)(cid:17)$(cid:3)(cid:13)*(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:18)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:7)(cid:3)!(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)%(cid:16)(cid:17)%(cid:17)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:28)(cid:3)(cid:25)(cid:17)(cid:28)(cid:13)*(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:16)(cid:3)$(cid:17)(cid:16)-(cid:3)(cid:12)**(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:23)4(cid:3)(cid:3),(cid:30)(cid:15)(cid:27)-(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:3)
(cid:17)%%(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:23)(cid:5)(cid:27)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:23)(cid:17)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:16)(cid:3)(cid:10)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:29)(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:18)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:3)#(cid:15)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:29)$(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:3)(cid:29)%(cid:15)(cid:22)(cid:12)(cid:3)*(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:3).(cid:17)(cid:23)(cid:30)(cid:3)(cid:9)(cid:9)((cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:3)0(cid:8)((cid:3)=>(cid:10)(cid:3)%(cid:16)(cid:17)&(cid:12)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:31)4(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:31)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:31)(cid:3)-(cid:27)(cid:17)$(cid:3)(cid:13)*(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:7)(cid:3)!(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:31)4(cid:3)(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:29)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:12)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:19)(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:24)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:12)(cid:3)5.(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:17)$(cid:31)-(cid:13)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:10)7(cid:10)(cid:19)(cid:3)#+7(cid:10)(cid:3)
(cid:24)(cid:16)(cid:13)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:13)%(cid:15)(cid:6)(cid:3)
#? (cid:3)3(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:5)%(cid:3)(cid:17)*(cid:3)#2(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:24)424(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:20)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:6)"(cid:3) @AA(cid:3)BCDAEFBGAAH
(cid:22)(cid:22)"(cid:3) (cid:15)(cid:22)(cid:30)(cid:12)(cid:6)(cid:3)2(cid:30)(cid:5)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:19)(cid:3)#? (cid:3)3(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:5)%(cid:3)
(cid:3) (cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:3)(cid:10)(cid:6)I(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:15)(cid:25)(cid:13)(cid:19)(cid:3)#3(cid:29)(cid:3)5%(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:23)(cid:13)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:31)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:3)
(cid:3) (cid:4)(cid:12)(cid:31)(cid:31)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:15)(cid:3)?(cid:5)(cid:11)(cid:11)(cid:19)(cid:3)#3(cid:29)(cid:3)(cid:24)(cid:16)(cid:17)&(cid:12)(cid:22)(cid:23)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:15)(cid:27)(cid:15)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:16)(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)

(cid:22)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:5)(cid:18)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:12)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:7)(cid:6)(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:3)(cid:2)(cid:0)
(cid:5)%(cid:24)(cid:29)(cid:31)(cid:30)!(cid:29)(cid:28)%-(cid:5),(cid:30)+
(cid:5),(cid:30)+
(cid:5)(cid:30)"(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:28)!#0
(cid:5)(cid:30)"(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:28)!#0(cid:5),(cid:30)+(cid:5)%(cid:24)(cid:29)(cid:31)(cid:30)!(cid:29)(cid:28)%-
(cid:5)%(cid:24)(cid:29)(cid:31)#(cid:24)*(cid:29)(cid:28)’
(cid:5)!(cid:29)(cid:28)&"(cid:30)$
(cid:5)!(cid:29)(cid:28)&"(cid:30)$
%(cid:24)!"(cid:23)
(cid:5)(#(cid:31)!*((cid:31)/(cid:5).
(cid:5)%(cid:24)(cid:29)(cid:31)#(cid:24)*(cid:29)(cid:28)’
!(cid:29)(cid:28)!(cid:31)*(cid:29)(cid:30))
(cid:5)%(cid:24)
(cid:31)(cid:29)#(cid:31)(cid:30)$
#"(cid:31)!
(cid:31)(cid:30)(cid:29)(cid:25)(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:5)(cid:26)(cid:25)(cid:24)(cid:23)
(cid:30)(cid:28)#((cid:31)(cid:25)(cid:28)(cid:27)
(cid:30)(cid:28)#((cid:31)(cid:25)(cid:28)(cid:27)
(cid:30)(cid:28)(cid:28)#(cid:31)(#-
(cid:30)(cid:28)(cid:28)#(cid:31)(#-
!(cid:29)(cid:28)!(cid:31)*(cid:29)(cid:30))
(cid:30)(cid:28)((cid:24)#(cid:24)’
(cid:30)(cid:28)(cid:28)#(cid:31)(#-
(cid:30)(cid:28)(cid:28)#(cid:31)(#-
88,8895
88,7:95
88,8895
88,7:95
88,8895
88,7:95
88,8895
88,7:95
88,8865
88,8765(cid:25)(cid:28)!(cid:24)4(cid:5)3%(cid:30)2"1
<=CBA(cid:5)@?>=<;
JJKJJJIH
H
G
(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:2)(cid:16)(cid:8)F(cid:8)E(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:5)E(cid:9)(cid:2)(cid:5)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:2)(cid:12)(cid:17)(cid:9)(cid:13)D
XS<WPOVP<U(cid:5)TSC<PRC(cid:5)QPONM(cid:5)<=CBA(cid:5);L
JJKJJ]I]
\
[
(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:2)(cid:9)(cid:8)E(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:2)(cid:3)Z(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:3)Y
JJK_‘HI‘
JJK_‘[IG
_
_
(cid:21)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:15)(cid:19)^(cid:21)(cid:3)(cid:3)(cid:2)D
<=CBA(cid:5);;
JJKJJHI‘
[
G
[
G
[
G
(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:2)(cid:3)Z(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:3)Y
JJKJJGI[
[
G
[
G
GH
G
f(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:5)I(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:15)(cid:22)(cid:8)E(cid:5)I(cid:21)(cid:15)b(cid:21)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:8)F(cid:5)I(cid:21)e(cid:11)Ddc(cid:5)(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:15)b(cid:17)a
JJKJJ\IJH
[
\
[
[
GH
G
f(cid:21)(cid:16)(cid:15)Z(cid:21)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:15)b(cid:21)c(cid:5)(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:2)(cid:16)(cid:8)F(cid:8)(cid:16)(cid:15)Z(cid:6)
JJKJJgI‘G
JJKJJGIG
J
G
J
G
\
J
(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:22)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:11)
<=CBA(cid:5)jih
JJKJJHI‘
[
G
[
G
[
G
(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:2)(cid:3)Z(cid:5)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:3)Y
JJKJJGI[
[
G
[
G
GH
G
(cid:21)(cid:3)(cid:8)(cid:2)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:0)
JJKJJ_I‘G
JJKJJGIGH
[
[
[
[
[
[
f(cid:21)(cid:16)(cid:15)Z(cid:21)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:15)(cid:15)b(cid:21)c(cid:5)(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:2)(cid:16)(cid:8)F(cid:8)(cid:16)(cid:15)Z(cid:6)
<=CBA(cid:5)kj
JJKJJGIg
[
\
[
\
[
[
(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:13)(cid:12)(cid:11)^(cid:21)emYd^(cid:21)(cid:3)(cid:2)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:22)l(cid:20)(cid:6)
JJKJ
JJKJJGIg
JJKJ HgG
J
J
J
p_
J]
p_
J]
[
_[
\G
G
(cid:21)(cid:12)(cid:20)(cid:13)o(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:2)(cid:17)(cid:13)n
JJK_‘‘IH‘
J
J
J
JJGHH
J_G[
JJGHH
J_G[
JJpH
_‘]]G
JJG‘
JJ‘
(cid:12)(cid:13)l(cid:2)q(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:2)(cid:17)(cid:13)n
(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:15)Zsr(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:0)
JJKJ_]
(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:9)(cid:15)Zs(cid:15)^(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:12)Z^(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:8)Z(cid:13)D
JJKJ
fE(cid:15)(cid:17)(cid:2)(cid:22)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:5)(cid:17)(cid:13)(cid:9)c(cid:5)(cid:21)(cid:17)(cid:21)(cid:13)(cid:16)(cid:5)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:22)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:11)
JJK_GHIG‘
(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:8)t(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:6)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:21)(cid:2)b(cid:11)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:2)(cid:17)(cid:13)n

TairaNaber PaofgPagees
MODIFICATIONOFCONTRACT PCAN-20-AE-0019
1 2
[>WaitinNarr [>Ereaive Date F Request |5-Capon
|AreServicesforMPDDalyand
ModificationNo.7 ‘S00Block16C pr013462/RK281939 __[0SSwingSpace
Tendey 7RamnBsy(oterreandne 6)
DeparotfmGeennertalServices DepartofmGeenneratl Services
‘ContractingandProcurementDivision CapitalConstructionDivision
3824MinnesoAvtoa,Sthfor. 13824MinnesoAtvea,SthNoor
Washington, OC 20018 Washin gton, O¢20018
Nar andAdSrossOfContactor No.Seal,ly,Sout,SateandZPCode) ‘BAArnofSaetarnNe
DLRGroupof0¢,P.c D5.DatedeamTT)
701&thStreetNW,Suit700
Washington,D¢20001 TOA WooftCarraacVOrgnerNo
Attn;RachelChung DCAN.20-AE-0019,
Email: rchung@dlraroup.com 06. Dated(Seetem T3)
January 21,2024
TTLTHIS ITEMONLYAPPLIESTOAMENDMENTSOFSOLICITATIONS.
[Fiearvenaredsncanidonoantoonnine Thala antom estestrmeenctoun [_fsaaroa]_Pracanaa
ersnsacon enti ereporeharodaepedwiestonooone.yo oS
tounge) By camNopreeanrd18a ain cpsoeamet)Byeereet is
trenenoneefDeoeeater) epeeSTV tsereseka
tressnab. FALUREOFYOURACRNOALEDGENENTTOBeRECENED AT THePLACEDESIGNATED FORTHE RECEIPTOF OFFERS
PRIORTOTHEHOURANDOATESPEGINEDMAYRESULTI REJECTIOOFNYOUROFFER Wy ve he eneetre core
treara sieseh argsryeretaoneh er team ateeee Pe
‘ciateandhsanener a swcehed ortotheope ha atapce,
FE AecouningandAopropraonDataReared)
TH THISTENAPPLIES ONLYTOMODIFICATIONSOFCONTRACTSIORDERS,
ITMODIFIESTHECONTRACTIOROERNO. ASDESCRIBEDINTEM14
[AThschangeorders soe prsiatto:(SectAutorty)
Liecnangesstot tem 14aremadentocoracorde intem 0A,
Is.TheabovenumberedconreclodersmecifedtoreflectheaamnsvabveChanges(aahasGangesmpayraSoe,aPpSpTaRER
ate,te.setfor nite 14
IcThssurremertalagreementserierediopursuant10aariyor
X_ [POSosa peotmoaieatonandaah) Tite27BGMSecions4726andContactDCAW-20-REOT.
JEmroRTANT ——Conrador[isnt [Xseauredosonsdoarardrau copy othewangte
6. Descriptionofamendmentimodificaton(Organizedby UCFSecton headings, includingsolistation/conracubjectmatterwherefeasible)
|ContactNo, DCAM-20-AE-0019forServicesforMPDDalyand OJSSwingSpace(theproject’)isherebymodifiedasfollows
1.NotToExceed Amount:
[ThisModification No. 07toDCAM-20-AE-0019isboingmadetoincorporateaddtional scopetotheprojct.Theaddtional scopeincludes
JoovisionofAEServicesforMOFclosetswhichinvolvestoanalyzepowerandcooingrequirementsaswellasto calculatetheoverall
|capactyofMOFandIDFroamsinordertotoconnectMOFandGinfloaclosetstothenewganerator.
[2 Asa resutofthechangesoutinedinthisModificationNo.07,Box14,Line1, theNottoExceediincreasedfrom$2,617,676.00by
[$26,000.00to$2,543,675.00ascutinedinExhibitA-Contractor'sProposal. Innoeventshallthecontractorbepaidmorethan
|52.543.675.00uniesstheContractorisauthorizedtoexceedthislimitinadvanceandinwritingbyDGSContractingOffer.
Js. RELEASE: itismutuallyagroedthatinexchangefo thisModificationandotherconsideration,theContractorherebyleases,waives,
[seteandholdsthe Departmentharmlessfromanyandallactualorpotential claimsordemandsfor delays,disruptions, additonalwork,
Jadcionaltime,adltionacast,contractextensions,compensationsorabiltyunderanytheory,whetherknownorunknown, thatthe
|ContractormayhavenowornthefutureagainsttheDepartmentarisingftomoroutof,as aconsequenceo resultofrelatingtoorinany
|mannerconnectedwiththisModification,theabove-referencedProject, andtheContractWork
|.Terms&Conditions:AllotherTexmsandConditionsremainunchanged.
SA areandTeeofSgnerTypeorp) cAasoConacigOfer
RachelChung annaShepherd
56.OLRGroupTDG. PC FSC DateSed|168.Dist ofCoumbia [66 ateSones
eos Kianna S25 e3e4
RachelChungEspterrsoe ositsi2024 —_-
Saeco Shepherd ===

(Continuation
ModificationofContract aogfPaeges
DCAN-20-AE-0019 ModificationNo.7 bot?
ContractRecap
LetterContract ExecutedonJanuary21,2021 $850,000.00
DotniizedContract ExecountAuegudst08,2021 '$1.575,000.00
MosificationNo. IncreaseValueofAgroomontandTimeExtension 585,000.00
ModificationNo, 2 IncroaseValueofAgreement ‘$87,800.00,
MedicationNo. 3 IncreaseValueofAgroament $29,000.00
ModificationNo, 4 IncreaseValuofAgreement $158,950.00
ModificationNo. 5 TimeExtension $0.00
ModificationNo. § IncreaseValueofAgreement $72,125.00,
ExtendedFinalCompletionDatefrom5/20/24to7/20/25
xtenedACodmplmetonnDatse tromr820a24bto8v720e25,
MeficationNo. 7 IncreaseinContrac'sValue '$28,000.00,
TotalContractsValue SEITE

1. Contract Number Page of Pages
MODIFICATION OF CONTRACT DCAM-20-AE-0019
1 2
2. Modification Number 3. Effective Date 4. Requisition/Purchase Request No. 5. Caption
A/E Services for MPD Daly and
Modification No.8 See Block 16C PR-014846/ RK302722, RK302465 OJS Swing Space
6. Issued By: 7. Administered By (If other than line 6)
Department of General Services Department of General Services
Contracting and Procurement Division Capital Construction Division
3924 Minnesota Ave, 5th floor. 3924 Minnesota Ave, 5th floor.
Washington, DC 20019 Washington, DC 20019
POC: Makia Efimba email: makia.efimba@dc.gov
8. Name and Address of Contractor (No. Street, city, country, state and ZIP Code) 9A. Amendment of Solicitation No.
DLR Group of DC, P.C 9B. Dated (See Item 11)
701 8th Street NW, Suit 700
Washington, DC 20001 10A. Modification of Contract/Order No.
Attn:Rachel Chung DCAM-20-AE-0019
X
Email: rchung@dlrgroup.com 10B. Dated (See Item 13)
January 21, 2021
11. THIS ITEM ONLY APPLIES TO AMENDMENTS OF SOLICITATIONS
The above numbered solicitation is amended as set forth in Item 14. The hour and date specified for receipt of Offers is extended. is not extended.
Offers must acknowledge receipt of this amendment prior to the hour and date specified in the solicitation or as amended, by one of the
following methods: (a) By completing Items 8 and 15, and returning copies of the amendment: (b) By acknowledging receipt of this
amendment on each copy of the offer submitted; or (c) By separate letter or fax which includes a reference to the solicitation and
amendment number. FAILURE OF YOUR ACKNOWLEDGEMENT TO BE RECEIVED AT THE PLACE DESIGNATED FOR THE RECEIPT OF OFFERS
PRIOR TO THE HOUR AND DATE SPECIFIED MAY RESULT IN REJECTION OF YOUR OFFER. If by virtue of this amendment you desire to change
an offer already submitted, such change may be made by letter or fax, provided each letter or telegram makes reference to the
solicitation and this amendment, and is received prior to the opening hour and date specified.
12. Accounting and Appropriation Data (If Required)
13. THIS ITEM APPLIES ONLY TO MODIFICATIONS OF CONTRACTS/ORDERS,
IT MODIFIES THE CONTRACT/ORDER NO. AS DESCRIBED IN ITEM 14
A. This change order is issued pursuant to: (Specify Authority)
The changes set forth in Item 14 are made in the contract/order no. in item 10A.
B. The above numbered contract/order is modified to reflect the administrative changes (such as changes in paying office, appropriation
date, etc.) set forth in item 14.
C. This supplemental agreement is entered into pursuant to authority of:
D. Other (Specify type of modification and authority) Title 27 DCMR Sections 4728 and Contract DCAM-20-AE-0019.
X
E. IMPORTANT: Contractor is not, 'X is required to sign this document and return 1 copy to the issuing office.
14. Description of amendment/modification (Organized by UCF Section headings, including solicitation/contract subject matter where feasible.)
Contract No. DCAM-20-AE-0019 for Services for MPD Daly and OJS Swing Space ("the project") is hereby modified as follows:
1. Not To Exceed Amount:
This Modification No. 08 to DCAM-20-AE-0019 is being made to incorporate the impact of the BZA ruling and the Design of a Secure Compartmented
Authorized Access Area on the project scope. The additional scope includes modification of construction documents to align with updated zoning
requirements, coordination with the historic preservation review board, and others, as further outlined in Exhibit A, the PCO.
2. As a result of the changes outlined in this Modification No. 08, Box 14, Line 1, the Not to Exceed is increased from $2,543,675.00 by $231,680.00 to
$2,775,355.00 as outlined in Exhibit B - Contractor's Proposal. In no event shall the contractor be paid more than $2,775,355.00 unless the Contractor is
authorized to exceed this limit in advance and in writing by DGS Contracting Officer.
Time Extension;
3. Final Completion Date: The Final Completion Date is hereby extended from 7/20/25 to 9/30/2026 to allow time to complete the project.
4. Administrative Term Date: The Administrative Term date is hereby extended from 8/20/25 to 10/30/2026. The Administrative Term is established for the
sole purpose of permitting the District of Columbia of the Chief Financial Officer to process payments in the event any payments become due.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall be construed to: extend the Substantial Completion Date; extend the Final Completion Date; and limit the
Department’s ability to assess liquidated damages.
5. RELEASE: It is mutually agreed that in exchange for this Modification and other considerations, the Contractor hereby releases, waives, settles, and holds
the Department harmless from any and all actual or potential claims or demands for delays, disruptions, additional work, additional time, additional cost,
contract extensions, compensations or liability under any theory, whether known or unknown, that the Contractor may have now or in the future against the
Department arising from or out of, as a consequence or result of, relating to or in any manner connected with this Modification, the above-referenced Project,
and the Contract Work.
6. Terms & Conditions: All other Terms and Conditions remain unchanged.
15A. Name and Title of Signer (Type or print) 16A. Name of Contracting Officer
Rachel Chung Kianna Shepherd
15B. DLR Group of DC, P.C 15C. Date Signed 16B. District of Columbia 16C. Date Signed
6/5/2025
(Signature of person authorized to sign) (Signature of Contracting Officer)

(Continuation)
Modification of Contract Page of Pages
DCAM-20-AE-0019
Modification No.8
2 of 2
7. Contract Recap
Letter Contract Executed on January 21, 2021 $950,000.00
Definitized Contract Executed on August 09, 2021 $1,575,000.00
Modification No. 1 Increase Value of Agreement and Time Extension $595,000.00
Modification No. 2 Increase Value of Agreement $87,600.00
Modification No. 3 Increase Value of Agreement $29,000.00
Modification No. 4 Increase Value of Agreement $158,950.00
Modification No. 5 Time Extension $0.00
Modification No. 6 Increase Value of Agreement $72,125.00
Extended Final Completion Date from 5/20/24 to 7/20/25
Extended Adminstrative Completion Date from 8/20/24 to 8/20/25
Modification No. 7 Increase in Contract's Value $26,000.00
Modification No. 8 Increase in Contract's Value $231,680.00
Extend Final Completion Date from 7/20/25 to 9/30/2026
Extend Adminstrative Completion Date from 8/20/25 to 10/30/2026
Total Contract's Value $2,775,355.00